Hellenistic period - Wikipedia
Jump to content Main menu Main menu move to sidebar hide Navigation Main page Contents Current events Random article About Wikipedia Contact us Donate Contribute Help Learn to edit Community portal Recent changes Upload file Search Search Create account Log in Personal tools Create account Log in Pages for logged out editors learn more Contributions Talk Contents move to sidebar hide Top 
1 Etymology 
2 Sources 
3 Background 
4 The Diadochi 
5 Southern Europe Toggle Southern Europe subsection 
5.1 Kingdom of Epirus 
5.2 Kingdom of Macedon 
5.3 Rest of Greece 
5.4 Balkans 
5.5 Western Mediterranean 
6 Hellenistic Near East Toggle Hellenistic Near East subsection 
6.1 Ptolemaic Kingdom 
6.2 Seleucid Empire 
6.3 Attalid Pergamum 
6.4 Galatia 
6.5 Bithynia 
6.6 Nabatean Kingdom 
6.7 Cappadocia 
6.8 Armenia 
6.9 Parthia 
6.1 
0 Judea 
6.1 
1 Kingdom of Pontus 
7 Other realms Toggle Other realms subsection 
7.1 GrecoBactrians 
7.2 IndoGreek kingdoms 
8 Rise of Rome 
9 Hellenistic culture Toggle Hellenistic culture subsection 
9.1 Spread 
9.2 Institutions 
9.3 Hellenization and acculturation 

9.3.1 Terracotta army 
9.4 Religion 
9.5 Literature 
9.6 Philosophy 
9.7 Sciences 
9.8 Military science 
9.9 Art 
9.1 
0 Sport 
10 Legacy Toggle Legacy subsection 
10.1 Influence on Christianity 
11 See also 
12 References Toggle References subsection 
12.1 Works cited 
13 Further reading 
14 External links Toggle the table of contents Hellenistic period 83 languages Afrikaans Alemannisch   Asturianu Azrbaycanca   Bnlmg   Bosanski Brezhoneg Catal  etina Cymraeg Dansk Deutsch Eesti  Espaol Esperanto Euskara  Franais Frysk Gaeilge Galego   Hrvatski Ido Bahasa Indonesia Interlingua slenska Italiano    Kurd  Latina Latvieu Ltzebuergesch Lietuvi Magyar       Nederlands  Norsk bokml Norsk nynorsk Ozbekcha     Piemontis Plattdtsch Polski Portugus Romn  Sicilianu Simple English Slovenina Slovenina    srpski Srpskohrvatski   Suomi Svenska   Trke   Ting Vit   Zazaki  Edit links Article Talk English Read Edit View history Tools Tools move to sidebar hide Actions Read Edit View history General What links here Related changes Upload file Special pages Permanent link Page information Cite this page Get shortened URL Download QR code Wikidata item Printexport Download as PDF Printable version In other projects Wikimedia Commons From Wikipedia the free encyclopedia Period of Greek history from 323 to 30 BC Greek world redirects here. For the geographical distribution of Greek speakers see Greek language. It has been suggested that Hellenistic Greece be merged into this article. Discuss Proposed since January 2024. The Nike of Samothrace is considered one of the greatest masterpieces of Hellenistic art. Part of a series on the History of Greece Neolithic Greece Pelasgians Greek Bronze Age Helladic Cycladic Minoan Mycenaean Greece 1750 BC1050 BC Ancient Greece Greek Dark Ages 1050 BC750 BC Archaic Greece 800 BC480 BC Classical Greece 500 BC3
23 BC Hellenistic Greece 323 BC31 BC Roman Greece 146 BC330 Medieval Greece Byzantine Greece Frankish and Latin states 1204 Early modern Greece Venetian Crete Venetian Ionian Islands Ottoman Greece Modern Greece Septinsular Republic War of Independence First Hellenic Republic Kingdom of Greece National Schism Second Hellenic Republic 
4 th of August Regime Axis occupation Collaborationist regime Free Greece Civil War Military Junta Third Hellenic Republic History by topic Agriculture Art Constitution Economy Judaism Military Names Greece portal v t e In classical antiquity the Hellenistic period covers the time in Mediterranean history after Classical Greece between the death of Alexander the Great in 323 BC and the death of Cleopatra VII 30 BC1 followed by the emergence of the Roman Empire as signified by the Battle of Actium in 31 BC and the conquest of Ptolemaic Egypt the following year.23 The Ancient Greek word Hellas  Hells was gradually recognized as the name for Greece from which the word Hellenistic was derived.4 Hellenistic is distinguished from Hellenic in that the latter refers to Greece itself while the former encompasses all ancient territories under Greek influence in particular the East after the conquests of Alexander the Great. After the Macedonian conquest of the Achaemenid Empire in 330 BC and its disintegration shortly after the Hellenistic kingdoms were established throughout southwest Asia Seleucid Empire Kingdom of Pergamon northeast Africa Ptolemaic Kingdom and South Asia GrecoBactrian Kingdom IndoGreek Kingdom.56 This resulted in an influx of Greek colonists and the export of Greek culture and language to these new realms spanning as far as modernday India. These new kingdoms were also influenced by the indigenous cultures adopting local practices where beneficial necessary or convenient. Hellenistic culture thus represents a fusion of the ancient Greek world with that of Western Asian Northeastern African and Southwestern Asian.7 This mixture gave rise to a common Atticbased Greek dialect known as Koine Greek which became the lingua franca throughout the ancient world. During the Hellenistic period Greek cultural influence and power reached its peak in the Mediterranean and beyond. Prosperity and progress in the arts literature theatre architecture music mathematics philosophy and science characterize the era. The Hellenistic period saw the rise of New Comedy Alexandrian poetry translation efforts such as the Septuagint and the philosophies of Stoicism Epicureanism and Pyrrhonism. In science the works of the mathematician Euclid and the polymath Archimedes are exemplary. Sculpture during this period was characterized by intense emotion and dynamic movement as seen in works like the Dying Gaul and the Venus De Milo. Hellenistic architecture emphasized grand monuments and ornate decorations exemplified by structures such as the Pergamon Altar. The religious sphere expanded to include new gods such as the GrecoEgyptian Serapis eastern deities such as Attis and Cybele and a syncretism between Hellenistic culture and Buddhism in Bactria and Northwest India. Scholars and historians are divided as to which event signals the end of the Hellenistic era. Proposals include the final conquest of the Greek heartlands by Rome in 146 BC following the Achaean War the final defeat of the Ptolemaic Kingdom at the Battle of Actium in 31 BC and the move by Roman emperor Constantine the Great of the capital of the Roman Empire to Constantinople in AD 3
30.8 9 Angelos Chaniotis ends the Hellenistic period with the death of Hadrian in AD 138 who integrated the Greeks fully into the Roman Empire though a range from c.321 BC to AD 256 may also be given.1011 Etymologyedit See also Names of the Greeks The word originated from ancient Greek  Hellnists one who uses the Greek language from  Hells Greece as if Hellenist  ic.citation needed Left image The Sampul tapestry a woolen wall hanging from Lop County Hotan Prefecture Xinjiang China possibly showing a Yuezhi wielding a spear and wearing what appears to be a diadem headband depicted above him is a centaur from Greek mythology a common motif in Hellenistic art Right image painted clay and alabaster head of a Zoroastrian priest wearing a distinctive Bactrianstyle headdress TakhtiSangin Tajikistan 
3 rd
2 nd century BC The idea of a Hellenistic period is a 
19 thcentury concept and did not exist in ancient Greece. Although words related in form or meaning e.g. Hellenist Ancient Greek  Hellnists have been attested since ancient times12 it was Johann Gustav Droysen in the mid
19 th century who in his classic work Geschichte des Hellenismus History of Hellenism coined the term Hellenistic to refer to and define the period when Greek culture spread in the nonGreek world after Alexanders conquest.13 Following Droysen Hellenistic and related terms e.g. Hellenism have been widely used in various contexts a notable such use is in Culture and Anarchy by Matthew Arnold where Hellenism is used in contrast with Hebraism.1415 The major issue with the term Hellenistic lies in its convenience as the spread of Greek culture was not the generalized phenomenon that the term implies. Some areas of the conquered world were more affected by Greek influences than others. The term Hellenistic also implies that the Greek populations were of majority in the areas in which they settled but in many cases the Greek settlers were actually the minority among the native populations. The Greek population and the native population did not always mix the Greeks moved and brought their own culture but interaction did not always occur.citation needed Sourcesedit While a few fragments exist there are no complete surviving historical works that date to the hundred years following Alexanders death. The works of the major Hellenistic historians Hieronymus of Cardia who worked under Alexander Antigonus I and other successors Duris of Samos and Phylarchus which were used by surviving sources are all lost.16 The earliest and most credible surviving source for the Hellenistic period is Polybius of Megalopolis c. 200118 a statesman of the Achaean League until 168 BC when he was forced to go to Rome as a hostage.16 His Histories eventually grew to a length of forty books covering the years 220 to 167 BC. The most important source after Polybius is Diodorus Siculus who wrote his Bibliotheca historica between 60 and 30 BC and reproduced some important earlier sources such as Hieronymus but his account of the Hellenistic period breaks off after the battle of Ipsus 301 BC. Another important source Plutarchs c.AD 50  c.120 Parallel Lives although more preoccupied with issues of personal character and morality outlines the history of important Hellenistic figures. Appian of Alexandria late 
1 st century ADbefore 165 wrote a history of the Roman empire that includes information of some Hellenistic kingdoms.citation needed Other sources include Justins 
2 nd century AD epitome of Pompeius Trogus Historiae Philipicae and a summary of Arrians Events after Alexander by Photios I of Constantinople. Lesser supplementary sources include Curtius Rufus Pausanias Pliny and the Byzantine encyclopedia the Suda. In the field of philosophy Diogenes Lartius Lives and Opinions of Eminent Philosophers is the main source works such as Ciceros De Natura Deorum also provide some further detail of philosophical schools in the Hellenistic period.citation needed Backgroundedit See also Philip II of Macedon Alexander the Great and Wars of Alexander the Great Alexander fighting the Persian king Darius III. From the Alexander Mosaic Naples National Archaeological Museum. This article is part of a series about Alexander the Great Early life Education Personal relationships Early rule Consolidation of power Balkan campaign Pelium Thebes Conquest of the Persian Empire Asia Minor Granicus Halicarnassus Syria Issus Tyre Egypt Gaza Mesopotamia Gaugamela Persia Persian Gate Persepolis Bactria Cyropolis Sogdian Rock Expedition into India Indian campaigns Cophen Aornos Hydaspes Mallian Death and legacy Death Tomb Hellenistic period Cities Cult Cultural impact Legends Alexander Romance Historiography Anabasis Chronology Cultural depictions Islamic theories v t e Ancient Greece had traditionally been a fractious collection of fiercely independent citystates. After the Peloponnesian War 431404 BC Greece had fallen under a Spartan hegemony in which Sparta was preeminent but not allpowerful. Spartan hegemony was succeeded by a Theban hegemony after the Battle of Leuctra 371 BC but after the Battle of Mantinea 362 BC all of Greece was so weakened that no one state could claim preeminence. It was against this backdrop that the ascendancy of Macedon began under king Philip II. Macedon was located at the periphery of the Greek world and although its royal family claimed Greek descent the Macedonians themselves were looked down upon as semibarbaric by the rest of the Greeks. However Macedon controlled a large area and had a relatively strong centralized government in comparison to most Greek states.17 Philip II was a strong and expansionist king who took every opportunity to expand Macedonian territory. In 352 BC he annexed Thessaly and Magnesia. In 338 BC Philip defeated a combined Theban and Athenian army at the Battle of Chaeronea after a decade of desultory conflict. In the aftermath Philip formed the League of Corinth effectively bringing the majority of Greece under his direct sway. He was elected Hegemon of the league and a campaign against the Achaemenid Empire of Persia was planned. However in 336 BC while this campaign was in its early stages he was assassinated.18 Alexanders empire at the time of its maximum expansion. Succeeding his father Alexander took over the Persian war himself. During a decade of campaigning Alexander conquered the whole Persian Empire overthrowing the Persian king Darius III. The conquered lands included Asia Minor Assyria the Levant Egypt Mesopotamia Media Persia and parts of modernday Afghanistan Pakistan and the steppes of central Asia. The years of constant campaigning had taken their toll however and Alexander died in 323 BC. After his death the huge territories Alexander had conquered became subject to a strong Greek influence Hellenization for the next two or three centuries until the rise of Rome in the west and of Parthia in the east. As the Greek and Levantine cultures mingled the development of a hybrid Hellenistic culture began and persisted even when isolated from the main centres of Greek culture for instance in the GrecoBactrian kingdom. It can be argued that some of the changes across the Macedonian Empire after Alexanders conquests and during the rule of the Diadochi would have occurred without the influence of Greek rule. As mentioned by Peter Green numerous factors of conquest have been merged under the term Hellenistic period. Specific areas conquered by Alexanders invading army including Egypt and areas of Asia Minor and Mesopotamia fell willingly to conquest and viewed Alexander as more of a liberator than a conqueror.19 In addition much of the area conquered would continue to be ruled by the Diadochi Alexanders generals and successors. Initially the whole empire was divided among them however some territories were lost relatively quickly or only remained nominally under Macedonian rule. After 200 years only much reduced and rather degenerate states remained9 until the conquest of Ptolemaic Egypt by Rome. The Diadochiedit Main articles Diadochi Wars of the Diadochi and Partition of Babylon Further information History of Macedonia ancient kingdom This section needs additional citations for verification. Please help improve this article by adding citations to reliable sources in this section. Unsourced material may be challenged and removed. February 2021 Learn how and when to remove this message The distribution of satrapies in the Macedonian Empire after the Settlement in Babylon 323 BC. When Alexander the Great died 10 June 323 BC he left behind a sprawling empire which was composed of many essentially autonomous territories called satraps. Without a chosen successor there were immediate disputes among his generals as to who should be king of Macedon. These generals became known as the Diadochi Greek  Diadokhoi meaning Successors. Meleager and the infantry supported the candidacy of Alexanders halfbrother Philip Arrhidaeus while Perdiccas the leading cavalry commander supported waiting until the birth of Alexanders child by Roxana. After the infantry stormed the palace of Babylon a compromise was arranged  Arrhidaeus as Philip III should become king and should rule jointly with Roxanas child assuming that it was a boy as it was becoming Alexander IV. Perdiccas himself would become regent epimeletes of the empire and Meleager his lieutenant. Soon however Perdiccas had Meleager and the other infantry leaders murdered and assumed full control.20 The generals who had supported Perdiccas were rewarded in the partition of Babylon by becoming satraps of the various parts of the empire but Perdiccas position was shaky because as Arrian writes everyone was suspicious of him and he of them.21 The first of the Diadochi wars broke out when Perdiccas planned to marry Alexanders sister Cleopatra and began to question Antigonus I Monophthalmus leadership in Asia Minor. Antigonus fled for Greece and then together with Antipater and Craterus the satrap of Cilicia who had been in Greece fighting the Lamian war invaded Anatolia. The rebels were supported by Lysimachus the satrap of Thrace and Ptolemy the satrap of Egypt. Although Eumenes satrap of Cappadocia defeated the rebels in Asia Minor Perdiccas himself was murdered by his own generals Peithon Seleucus and Antigenes possibly with Ptolemys aid during his invasion of Egypt c.21 May to 19 June 320 BC.22 Ptolemy came to terms with Perdiccass murderers making Peithon and Arrhidaeus regents in his place but soon these came to a new agreement with Antipater at the Treaty of Triparadisus. Antipater was made regent of the Empire and the two kings were moved to Macedon. Antigonus remained in charge of Asia Minor Ptolemy retained Egypt Lysimachus retained Thrace and Seleucus I controlled Babylon. The Kingdoms of Antigonos and his rivals c.303 BC. The second Diadochi war began following the death of Antipater in 319 BC. Passing over his own son Cassander Antipater had declared Polyperchon his successor as Regent.23 Cassander rose in revolt against Polyperchon who was joined by Eumenes and was supported by Antigonus Lysimachus and Ptolemy. In 317 BC Cassander invaded Macedonia attaining control of Macedon sentencing Olympias to death and capturing the boy king Alexander IV and his mother. In Asia Eumenes was betrayed by his own men after years of campaign and was given up to Antigonus who had him executed. The third war of the Diadochi broke out because of the growing power and ambition of Antigonus. He began removing and appointing satraps as if he were king and also raided the royal treasuries in Ecbatana Persepolis and Susa making off with 25000 talents.24 Seleucus was forced to flee to Egypt and Antigonus was soon at war with Ptolemy Lysimachus and Cassander. He then invaded Phoenicia laid siege to Tyre stormed Gaza and began building a fleet. Ptolemy invaded Syria and defeated Antigonus son Demetrius Poliorcetes in the Battle of Gaza of 312 BC which allowed Seleucus to secure control of Babylonia and the eastern satrapies. In 310 BC Cassander had young King Alexander IV and his mother Roxana murdered ending the Argead dynasty which had ruled Macedon for several centuries. Kingdoms of the Diadochi after the battle of Ipsus c.301 BC. Kingdom of Ptolemy I Soter Kingdom of Cassander Kingdom of Lysimachus Kingdom of Seleucus I Nicator The major Hellenistic kingdoms in 240 BC including territories controlled by the Seleucid dynasty the Ptolemaic dynasty the Attalid dynasty the Antigonid dynasty and independent poleis of Hellenistic Greece Antigonus then sent his son Demetrius to regain control of Greece. In 307 BC he took Athens expelling Demetrius of Phaleron Cassanders governor and proclaiming the city free again. Demetrius now turned his attention to Ptolemy defeating his fleet at the Battle of Salamis and taking control of Cyprus.23 In the aftermath of this victory Antigonus took the title of king basileus and bestowed it on his son Demetrius Poliorcetes the rest of the Diadochi soon followed suit.25 Demetrius continued his campaigns by laying siege to Rhodes and conquering most of Greece in 302 BC creating a league against Cassanders Macedon. The decisive engagement of the war came when Lysimachus invaded and overran much of western Anatolia but was soon isolated by Antigonus and Demetrius near Ipsus in Phrygia. Seleucus arrived in time to save Lysimachus and utterly crushed Antigonus at the Battle of Ipsus in 301 BC. Seleucus war elephants proved decisive Antigonus was killed and Demetrius fled back to Greece to attempt to preserve the remnants of his rule there by recapturing a rebellious Athens. Meanwhile Lysimachus took over Ionia Seleucus took Cilicia and Ptolemy captured Cyprus. After Cassanders death in c.298 BC however Demetrius who still maintained a sizable loyal army and fleet invaded Macedon seized the Macedonian throne 294 BC and conquered Thessaly and most of central Greece 293291 BC.26 He was defeated in 288 BC when Lysimachus of Thrace and Pyrrhus of Epirus invaded Macedon on two fronts and quickly carved up the kingdom for themselves. Demetrius fled to central Greece with his mercenaries and began to build support there and in the northern Peloponnese. He once again laid siege to Athens after they turned on him but then struck a treaty with the Athenians and Ptolemy which allowed him to cross over to Asia Minor and wage war on Lysimachus holdings in Ionia leaving his son Antigonus Gonatas in Greece. After initial successes he was forced to surrender to Seleucus in 285 BC and later died in captivity.27 Lysimachus who had seized Macedon and Thessaly for himself was forced into war when Seleucus invaded his territories in Asia Minor and was defeated and killed in 281 BC at the Battle of Corupedium near Sardis. Seleucus then attempted to conquer Lysimachus European territories in Thrace and Macedon but he was assassinated by Ptolemy Ceraunus the thunderbolt who had taken refuge at the Seleucid court and then had himself acclaimed as king of Macedon. Ptolemy was killed when Macedon was invaded by Gauls in 279 BChis head stuck on a spearand the country fell into anarchy. Antigonus II Gonatas invaded Thrace in the summer of 277 and defeated a large force of 18000 Gauls. He was quickly hailed as king of Macedon and went on to rule for 35 years.28 At this point the tripartite territorial division of the Hellenistic age was in place with the main Hellenistic powers being Macedon under Demetriuss son Antigonus II Gonatas the Ptolemaic kingdom under the aged Ptolemy I and the Seleucid empire under Seleucus son Antiochus I Soter. Southern Europeedit This section needs additional citations for verification. Please help improve this article by adding citations to reliable sources in this section. Unsourced material may be challenged and removed. February 2021 Learn how and when to remove this message Kingdom of Epirusedit Main article Epirus ancient state Epirus was a northwestern Greek kingdom in the western Balkans ruled by the Molossian Aeacidae dynasty. Epirus was an ally of Macedon during the reigns of Philip II and Alexander. In 281 Pyrrhus nicknamed the eagle aetos invaded southern Italy to aid the city state of Tarentum. Pyrrhus defeated the Romans in the Battle of Heraclea and at the Battle of Asculum. Though victorious he was forced to retreat due to heavy losses hence the term Pyrrhic victory. Pyrrhus then turned south and invaded Sicily but was unsuccessful and returned to Italy. After the Battle of Beneventum 275 BC Pyrrhus lost all his Italian holdings and left for Epirus. Pyrrhus then went to war with Macedonia in 275 BC deposing Antigonus II Gonatas and briefly ruling over Macedonia and Thessaly until 272. Afterwards he invaded southern Greece and was killed in battle against Argos in 272 BC. After the death of Pyrrhus Epirus remained a minor power. In 233 BC the Aeacid royal family was deposed and a federal state was set up called the Epirote League. The league was conquered by Rome in the Third Macedonian War 171168 BC. Kingdom of Macedonedit Main article Antigonid dynasty Philip V the darling of Hellas wearing the royal diadem. Antigonus II a student of Zeno of Citium spent most of his rule defending Macedon against Epirus and cementing Macedonian power in Greece first against the Athenians in the Chremonidean War and then against the Achaean League of Aratus of Sicyon. Under the Antigonids Macedonia was often short on funds the Pangaeum mines were no longer as productive as under Philip II the wealth from Alexanders campaigns had been used up and the countryside pillaged by the Gallic invasion.29 A large number of the Macedonian population had also been resettled abroad by Alexander or had chosen to emigrate to the new eastern Greek cities. Up to twothirds of the population emigrated and the Macedonian army could only count on a levy of 25000 men a significantly smaller force than under Philip II.30 Antigonus II ruled until his death in 239 BC. His son Demetrius II soon died in 229 BC leaving a child Philip V as king with the general Antigonus Doson as regent. Doson led Macedon to victory in the war against the Spartan king Cleomenes III and occupied Sparta. Philip V who came to power when Doson died in 221 BC was the last Macedonian ruler with both the talent and the opportunity to unite Greece and preserve its independence against the cloud rising in the west the everincreasing power of Rome. He was known as the darling of Hellas. Under his auspices the Peace of Naupactus 217 BC brought the latest war between Macedon and the Greek leagues the Social War of 220217 BC to an end and at this time he controlled all of Greece except Athens Rhodes and Pergamum. In 215 BC Philip with his eye on Illyria formed an alliance with Romes enemy Hannibal of Carthage which led to Roman alliances with the Achaean League Rhodes and Pergamum. The First Macedonian War broke out in 212 BC and ended inconclusively in 205 BC. Philip continued to wage war against Pergamum and Rhodes for control of the Aegean 204200 BC and ignored Roman demands for nonintervention in Greece by invading Attica. In 198 BC during the Second Macedonian War Philip was decisively defeated at Cynoscephalae by the Roman proconsul Titus Quinctius Flamininus and Macedon lost all its territories in Greece proper. Southern Greece was now thoroughly brought into the Roman sphere of influence though it retained nominal autonomy. The end of Antigonid Macedon came when Philip Vs son Perseus was defeated and captured by the Romans in the Third Macedonian War 171168 BC. Rest of Greeceedit Main article Hellenistic Greece Greece and the Aegean World c.200 BC. During the Hellenistic period the importance of Greece proper within the Greekspeaking world declined sharply. The great centers of Hellenistic culture were Alexandria and Antioch capitals of Ptolemaic Egypt and Seleucid Syria respectively. The conquests of Alexander greatly widened the horizons of the Greek world making the endless conflicts between the cities which had marked the 
5 th and 
4 th centuries BC seem petty and unimportant. It led to a steady emigration particularly of the young and ambitious to the new Greek empires in the east. Many Greeks migrated to Alexandria Antioch and the many other new Hellenistic cities founded in Alexanders wake as far away as modern Afghanistan and Pakistan. Independent city states were unable to compete with Hellenistic kingdoms and were usually forced to ally themselves to one of them for defense giving honors to Hellenistic rulers in return for protection. One example is Athens which had been decisively defeated by Antipater in the Lamian war 323322 BC and had its port in the Piraeus garrisoned by Macedonian troops who supported a conservative oligarchy.31 After Demetrius Poliorcetes captured Athens in 307 BC and restored the democracy the Athenians honored him and his father Antigonus by placing gold statues of them on the agora and granting them the title of king. Athens later allied itself to Ptolemaic Egypt to throw off Macedonian rule eventually setting up a religious cult for the Ptolemaic kings and naming one of the citys phyles in honour of Ptolemy for his aid against Macedon. In spite of the Ptolemaic monies and fleets backing their endeavors Athens and Sparta were defeated by Antigonus II during the Chremonidean War 267261 BC. Athens was then occupied by Macedonian troops and run by Macedonian officials. Sparta remained independent but it was no longer the leading military power in the Peloponnese. The Spartan king Cleomenes III 235222 BC staged a military coup against the conservative ephors and pushed through radical social and land reforms in order to increase the size of the shrinking Spartan citizenry able to provide military service and restore Spartan power. Spartas bid for supremacy was crushed at the Battle of Sellasia 222 BC by the Achaean league and Macedon who restored the power of the ephors. Other city states formed federated states in selfdefense such as the Aetolian League est. 370 BC the Achaean League est. 280 BC the Boeotian league the Northern League Byzantium Chalcedon Heraclea Pontica and Tium32 and the Nesiotic League of the Cyclades. These federations involved a central government which controlled foreign policy and military affairs while leaving most of the local governing to the city states a system termed sympoliteia. In states such as the Achaean league this also involved the admission of other ethnic groups into the federation with equal rights in this case nonAchaeans.33 The Achean league was able to drive out the Macedonians from the Peloponnese and free Corinth which duly joined the league. One of the few city states who managed to maintain full independence from the control of any Hellenistic kingdom was Rhodes. With a skilled navy to protect its trade fleets from pirates and an ideal strategic position covering the routes from the east into the Aegean Rhodes prospered during the Hellenistic period. It became a center of culture and commerce its coins were widely circulated and its philosophical schools became one of the best in the Mediterranean. After holding out for one year under siege by Demetrius Poliorcetes 305304 BC the Rhodians built the Colossus of Rhodes to commemorate their victory. They retained their independence by the maintenance of a powerful navy by maintaining a carefully neutral posture and acting to preserve the balance of power between the major Hellenistic kingdoms.34 Initially Rhodes had very close ties with the Ptolemaic kingdom. Rhodes later became a Roman ally against the Seleucids receiving some territory in Caria for their role in the RomanSeleucid War 192188 BC. Rome eventually turned on Rhodes and annexed the island as a Roman province. Balkansedit Painting of a groom and bride from the Hellenistic Thracian Tomb of Kazanlak near the ancient city of Seuthopolis 
4 th century BC. The west Balkan coast was inhabited by various Illyrian tribes and kingdoms such as the kingdom of the Dalmatae and of the Ardiaei who often engaged in piracy under Queen Teuta reigned 231227 BC. Further inland was the Illyrian Paeonian Kingdom and the tribe of the Agrianes. Illyrians on the coast of the Adriatic were under the effects and influence of Hellenisation and some tribes adopted Greek becoming bilingual353637 due to their proximity to the Greek colonies in Illyria. Illyrians imported weapons and armor from the ancient Greeks such as the Illyrian type helmet originally a Greek type and also adopted the ornamentation of ancient Macedon on their shields38 and their war belts39 a single one has been found dated 
3 rd century BC at modern Selce e Poshtme a part of Macedon at the time under Philip V of Macedon40. The Odrysian Kingdom was a union of Thracian tribes under the kings of the powerful Odrysian tribe. Various parts of Thrace were under Macedonian rule under Philip II of Macedon Alexander the Great Lysimachus Ptolemy II and Philip V but were also often ruled by their own kings. The Thracians and Agrianes were widely used by Alexander as peltasts and light cavalry forming about one fifth of his army.41 The Diadochi also used Thracian mercenaries in their armies and they were also used as colonists. The Odrysians used Greek as the language of administration42 and of the nobility. The nobility also adopted Greek fashions in dress ornament and military equipment spreading it to the other tribes.43 Thracian kings were among the first to be Hellenized.44 After 278 BC the Odrysians had a strong competitor in the Celtic Kingdom of Tylis ruled by the kings Comontorius and Cavarus but in 212 BC they conquered their enemies and destroyed their capital. Western Mediterraneanedit Further information Colonies in antiquity and Greek coinage of Italy and Sicily A silver drachma from Massalia modern Marseille France dated 375200 BC with the head of the goddess Artemis on the obverse and a lion on the reverse Southern Italy Magna Graecia and southeastern Sicily had been colonized by the Greeks during the 
8 th century BC. In 
4 thcentury BC Sicily the leading Greek city and hegemon was Syracuse. During the Hellenistic period the leading figure in Sicily was Agathocles of Syracuse 361289 BC who seized the city with an army of mercenaries in 317 BC. Agathocles extended his power throughout most of the Greek cities in Sicily fought a long war with the Carthaginians at one point invading Tunisia in 310 BC and defeating a Carthaginian army there. This was the first time a European force had invaded the region. After this war he controlled most of southeast Sicily and had himself proclaimed king in imitation of the Hellenistic monarchs of the east.45 Agathocles then invaded Italy c.300 BC in defense of Tarentum against the Bruttians and Romans but was unsuccessful. GalloGreek inscription Segomaros son of Uill citizen toutious of Namausos dedicated this sanctuary to Belesama Greeks in preRoman Gaul were mostly limited to the Mediterranean coast of Provence France. The first Greek colony in the region was Massalia which became one of the largest trading ports of Mediterranean by the 
4 th century BC with 6000 inhabitants. Massalia was also the local hegemon controlling various coastal Greek cities like Nice and Agde. The coins minted in Massalia have been found in all parts of LiguroCeltic Gaul. Celtic coinage was influenced by Greek designs46 and Greek letters can be found on various Celtic coins especially those of Southern France.47 Traders from Massalia ventured inland deep into France on the Rivers Durance and Rhne and established overland trade routes deep into Gaul and to Switzerland and Burgundy. The Hellenistic period saw the Greek alphabet spread into southern Gaul from Massalia 
3 rd and 
2 nd centuries BC and according to Strabo Massalia was also a center of education where Celts went to learn Greek.48 A staunch ally of Rome Massalia retained its independence until it sided with Pompey in 49 BC and was then taken by Caesars forces. The city of Emporion modern Empries originally founded by Archaicperiod settlers from Phocaea and Massalia in the 
6 th century BC near the village of Sant Mart dEmpries located on an offshore island that forms part of LEscala Catalonia Spain49 was reestablished in the 
5 th century BC with a new city neapolis on the Iberian mainland.50 Emporion contained a mixed population of Greek colonists and Iberian natives and although Livy and Strabo assert that they lived in different quarters these two groups were eventually integrated.51 The city became a dominant trading hub and center of Hellenistic civilization in Iberia eventually siding with the Roman Republic against the Carthaginian Empire during the Second Punic War 218201 BC.52 However Emporion lost its political independence around 195 BC with the establishment of the Roman province of Hispania Citerior and by the 
1 st century BC had become fully Romanized in culture.5354 Hellenistic Near Eastedit This section needs additional citations for verification. Please help improve this article by adding citations to reliable sources in this section. Unsourced material may be challenged and removed. February 2021 Learn how and when to remove this message The Hellenistic states of Asia and Egypt were run by an occupying imperial elite of GrecoMacedonian administrators and governors propped up by a standing army of mercenaries and a small core of GrecoMacedonian settlers.55 Promotion of immigration from Greece was important in the establishment of this system. Hellenistic monarchs ran their kingdoms as royal estates and most of the heavy tax revenues went into the military and paramilitary forces which preserved their rule from any kind of revolution. Macedonian and Hellenistic monarchs were expected to lead their armies on the field along with a group of privileged aristocratic companions or friends hetairoi philoi which dined and drank with the king and acted as his advisory council.56 The monarch was also expected to serve as a charitable patron of the people this public philanthropy could mean building projects and handing out gifts but also promotion of Greek culture and religion. Ptolemaic Kingdomedit Main article Ptolemaic Kingdom Bust of Ptolemy I Soter left wearing a diadem a symbol of Hellenistic kingship. Ring of Ptolemy VI Philometor right as Egyptian pharaoh. Both pieces in the Louvre Museum. Ptolemy a somatophylax one of the seven bodyguards who served as Alexander the Greats generals and deputies was appointed satrap of Egypt after Alexanders death in 323 BC. In 305 BC he declared himself King Ptolemy I later known as Soter saviour for his role in helping the Rhodians during the siege of Rhodes. Ptolemy built new cities such as Ptolemais Hermiou in upper Egypt and settled his veterans throughout the country especially in the region of the Faiyum. Alexandria a major center of Greek culture and trade became his capital city. As Egypts first port city it became the main grain exporter in the Mediterranean. The Egyptians begrudgingly accepted the Ptolemies as the successors to the pharaohs of independent Egypt though the kingdom went through several native revolts. Ptolemy I began to order monetary contributions from the people and as a result rewarded cities with high contribution with royal benefaction. This often resulted in the formation of a royal cult within the city. Reservations about this activity slowly dissipated as this worship of mortals was justified by the precedent of the worshipping of Greek heroes.57 The Ptolemies took on the traditions of the Egyptian Pharaohs such as marrying their siblings Ptolemy II was the first to adopt this custom having themselves portrayed on public monuments in Egyptian style and dress and participating in Egyptian religious life. The Ptolemaic ruler cult portrayed the Ptolemies as gods and temples to the Ptolemies were erected throughout the kingdom. Ptolemy I even created a new god Serapis who was a combination of two Egyptian gods Apis and Osiris with attributes of Greek gods. Ptolemaic administration was like the ancient Egyptian bureaucracy highly centralized and focused on squeezing as much revenue out of the population as possible through tariffs excise duties fines taxes and so forth. A whole class of petty officials tax farmers clerks and overseers made this possible. The Egyptian countryside was directly administered by this royal bureaucracy.58 External possessions such as Cyprus and Cyrene were run by strategoi military commanders appointed by the crown. Under Ptolemy II Callimachus Apollonius of Rhodes Theocritus and a host of other poets including the Alexandrian Pleiad made the city a center of Hellenistic literature. Ptolemy himself was eager to patronise the library scientific research and individual scholars who lived on the grounds of the library. He and his successors also fought a series of wars with the Seleucids known as the Syrian wars over the region of CoeleSyria. Ptolemy IV won the great battle of Raphia 217 BC against the Seleucids using native Egyptians trained as phalangites. However these Egyptian soldiers revolted eventually setting up a native breakaway Egyptian state in the Thebaid between 205 and 186185 BC severely weakening the Ptolemaic state.59 Ptolemys family ruled Egypt until the Roman conquest of 30 BC. All the male rulers of the dynasty took the name Ptolemy. Ptolemaic queens some of whom were the sisters of their husbands were usually called Cleopatra Arsinoe or Berenice. The most famous member of the line was the last queen Cleopatra VII known for her role in the Roman political battles between Julius Caesar and Pompey and later between Octavian and Mark Antony. Her suicide at the conquest by Rome marked the end of Ptolemaic rule in Egypt though Hellenistic culture continued to thrive in Egypt throughout the Roman and Byzantine periods until the Muslim conquest. Seleucid Empireedit Main article Seleucid Empire Seleucus I Nicator founded the Seleucid Empire. Following division of Alexanders empire Seleucus I Nicator received Babylonia. From there he created a new empire which expanded to include much of Alexanders near eastern territories.60616263 At the height of its power it included central Anatolia the Levant Mesopotamia Persia todays Turkmenistan Pamir and parts of Pakistan. It included a diverse population estimated at fifty to sixty million people.64 Under Antiochus I c.324323  261 BC however the unwieldy empire was already beginning to shed territories. Pergamum broke away under Eumenes I who defeated a Seleucid army sent against him. The kingdoms of Cappadocia Bithynia and Pontus were all practically independent by this time as well. Like the Ptolemies Antiochus I established a dynastic religious cult deifying his father Seleucus I. Seleucus officially said to be descended from Apollo had his own priests and monthly sacrifices. The erosion of the empire continued under Seleucus II who was forced to fight a civil war 239236 BC against his brother Antiochus Hierax and was unable to keep Bactria Sogdiana and Parthia from breaking away. Hierax carved off most of Seleucid Anatolia for himself but was defeated along with his Galatian allies by Attalus I of Pergamon who now also claimed kingship. The vast Seleucid Empire was like Egypt mostly dominated by a GrecoMacedonian political elite.63656667 The Greek population of the cities who formed the dominant elite were reinforced by emigration from Greece.6365 These cities included newly founded colonies such as Antioch the other cities of the Syrian tetrapolis Seleucia north of Babylon and DuraEuropos on the Euphrates. These cities retained traditional Greek city state institutions such as assemblies councils and elected magistrates but this was a facade for they were always controlled by the royal Seleucid officials. Apart from these cities there were also a large number of Seleucid garrisons choria military colonies katoikiai and Greek villages komai which the Seleucids planted throughout the empire to cement their rule. This GrecoMacedonian population which also included the sons of settlers who had married local women could make up a phalanx of 35000 men out of a total Seleucid army of 80000 during the reign of Antiochus III. The rest of the army was made up of native troops.68 Antiochus III the Great conducted several vigorous campaigns to retake all the lost provinces of the empire since the death of Seleucus I. After being defeated by Ptolemy IVs forces at Raphia 217 BC Antiochus III led a long campaign to the east to subdue the far eastern breakaway provinces 212205 BC including Bactria Parthia Ariana Sogdiana Gedrosia and Drangiana. He was successful bringing back most of these provinces into at least nominal vassalage and receiving tribute from their rulers.69 After the death of Ptolemy IV 204 BC Antiochus took advantage of the weakness of Egypt to conquer CoeleSyria in the fifth Syrian war 202195 BC.70 He then began expanding his influence into Pergamene territory in Asia and crossed into Europe fortifying Lysimachia on the Hellespont but his expansion into Anatolia and Greece was abruptly halted after a decisive defeat at the Battle of Magnesia 190 BC. In the Treaty of Apamea which ended the war Antiochus lost all of his territories in Anatolia west of the Taurus and was forced to pay a large indemnity of 15000 talents.71 Much of the eastern part of the empire was then conquered by the Parthians under Mithridates I of Parthia in the mid
2 nd century BC yet the Seleucid kings continued to rule a rump state from Syria until the invasion by the Armenian king Tigranes the Great and their ultimate overthrow by the Roman general Pompey. Attalid Pergamumedit Main article Kingdom of Pergamon External videos The Pergamon Altar Smarthistory72 After the death of Lysimachus one of his officers Philetaerus took control of the city of Pergamum in 282 BC along with Lysimachus war chest of 9000 talents and declared himself loyal to Seleucus I while remaining de facto independent. His descendant Attalus I defeated the invading Galatians and proclaimed himself an independent king. Attalus I 241197 BC was a staunch ally of Rome against Philip V of Macedon during the first and second Macedonian Wars. For his support against the Seleucids in 190 BC Eumenes II was rewarded with all the former Seleucid domains in Asia Minor. Eumenes II turned Pergamon into a centre of culture and science by establishing the Library of Pergamum which was said to be second only to the Library of Alexandria73 with 200000 volumes according to Plutarch. It included a reading room and a collection of paintings. Eumenes II also constructed the Pergamum Altar with friezes depicting the Gigantomachy on the acropolis of the city. Pergamum was also a center of parchment charta pergamena production. The Attalids ruled Pergamon until Attalus III bequeathed the Kingdom of Pergamon to the Roman Republic in 133 BC74 to avoid a likely succession crisis. Galatiaedit Main article Galatia The Celts who settled in Galatia came through Thrace under the leadership of Leotarios and Leonnorios c.270 BC. They were defeated by Seleucus I in the battle of the Elephants but were still able to establish a Celtic territory in central Anatolia. The Galatians were well respected as warriors and were widely used as mercenaries in the armies of the successor states. They continued to attack neighboring kingdoms such as Bithynia and Pergamon plundering and extracting tribute. This came to an end when they sided with the renegade Seleucid prince Antiochus Hierax who tried to defeat Attalus the ruler of Pergamon 241197 BC. Attalus severely defeated the Gauls forcing them to confine themselves to Galatia. The theme of the Dying Gaul a famous statue displayed in Pergamon remained a favorite in Hellenistic art for a generation signifying the victory of the Greeks over a noble enemy. In the early 
2 nd century BC the Galatians became allies of Antiochus the Great the last Seleucid king trying to regain suzerainty over Asia Minor. In 189 BC Rome sent Gnaeus Manlius Vulso on an expedition against the Galatians. Galatia was henceforth dominated by Rome through regional rulers from 189 BC onward. After their defeats by Pergamon and Rome the Galatians slowly became Hellenized and they were called GalloGraeci by the historian Justin75 as well as  Hellnogaltai by Diodorus Siculus in his Bibliotheca historica v.
32.5  who wrote that they were called HellenoGalatians because of their connection with the Greeks.76 Bithyniaedit Main article Kingdom of Bithynia Map of the world in 200 BC showing the Hellenistic kingdoms dark green and Bithynia The Bithynians were a Thracian people living in northwest Anatolia. After Alexanders conquests the region of Bithynia came under the rule of the native king Bas who defeated Calas a general of Alexander the Great and maintained the independence of Bithynia. His son Zipoetes I of Bithynia maintained this autonomy against Lysimachus and Seleucus I and assumed the title of king basileus in 297 BC. His son and successor Nicomedes I founded Nicomedia which soon rose to great prosperity and during his long reign c.278  c.255 BC as well as those of his successors the Kingdom of Bithynia held a considerable place among the minor monarchies of Anatolia. Nicomedes also invited the Celtic Galatians into Anatolia as mercenaries and they later turned on his son Prusias I who defeated them in battle. Their last king Nicomedes IV was unable to maintain himself against Mithridates VI of Pontus and after being restored to his throne by the Roman Senate he bequeathed his kingdom by will to the Roman Republic 74 BC. Nabatean Kingdomedit Main article Nabatean Kingdom AlKhazneh in Petra shows the Hellenistic influences on the Nabatean capital city The Nabatean Kingdom was an Arab state located between the Sinai Peninsula and the Arabian Peninsula. Its capital was the city of Petra an important trading city on the incense route. The Nabateans resisted the attacks of Antigonus and were allies of the Hasmoneans in their struggle against the Seleucids but later fought against Herod the Great. The hellenization of the Nabateans occurred relatively late in comparison to the surrounding regions. Nabatean material culture does not show any Greek influence until the reign of Aretas III Philhellene in the 
1 st century BC.77 Aretas captured Damascus and built the Petra pool complex and gardens in the Hellenistic style. Though the Nabateans originally worshipped their traditional gods in symbolic form such as stone blocks or pillars during the Hellenistic period they began to identify their gods with Greek gods and depict them in figurative forms influenced by Greek sculpture.78 Nabatean art shows Greek influences and paintings have been found depicting Dionysian scenes.79 They also slowly adopted Greek as a language of commerce along with Aramaic and Arabic. Cappadociaedit Main article Kingdom of Cappadocia Cappadocia a mountainous region situated between Pontus and the Taurus mountains was ruled by a Persian dynasty. Ariarathes I 332322 BC was the satrap of Cappadocia under the Persians and after the conquests of Alexander he retained his post. After Alexanders death he was defeated by Eumenes and crucified in 322 BC but his son Ariarathes II managed to regain the throne and maintain his autonomy against the warring Diadochi. In 255 BC Ariarathes III took the title of king and married Stratonice a daughter of Antiochus II remaining an ally of the Seleucid kingdom. Under Ariarathes IV Cappadocia came into relations with Rome first as a foe espousing the cause of Antiochus the Great then as an ally against Perseus of Macedon and finally in a war against the Seleucids. Ariarathes V also waged war with Rome against Aristonicus a claimant to the throne of Pergamon and their forces were annihilated in 130 BC. This defeat allowed Pontus to invade and conquer the kingdom. Armeniaedit Main article Kingdom of Armenia antiquity Orontid Armenia formally passed to the empire of Alexander the Great following his conquest of Persia. Alexander appointed an Orontid named Mithranes to govern Armenia. Armenia later became a vassal state of the Seleucid Empire but it maintained a considerable degree of autonomy retaining its native rulers. Towards the end 212 BC the country was divided into two kingdoms Greater Armenia and Armenia Sophene including Commagene or Armenia Minor. The kingdoms became so independent from Seleucid control that Antiochus III the Great waged war on them during his reign and replaced their rulers. After the Seleucid defeat at the Battle of Magnesia in 190 BC the kings of Sophene and Greater Armenia revolted and declared their independence with Artaxias becoming the first king of the Artaxiad dynasty of Armenia in 188 BC. During the reign of the Artaxiads Armenia went through a period of hellenization. Numismatic evidence shows Greek artistic styles and the use of the Greek language. Some coins describe the Armenian kings as Philhellenes. During the reign of Tigranes the Great 9555 BC the kingdom of Armenia reached its greatest extent containing many Greek cities including the entire Syrian tetrapolis. Cleopatra the wife of Tigranes the Great invited Greeks such as the rhetor Amphicrates and the historian Metrodorus of Scepsis to the Armenian court andaccording to Plutarchwhen the Roman general Lucullus seized the Armenian capital Tigranocerta he found a troupe of Greek actors who had arrived to perform plays for Tigranes.80 Tigranes successor Artavasdes II even composed Greek tragedies himself. Parthiaedit See also Parthian Empire A sculpted head of a Parthian wearing a Hellenisticstyle helmet from Nisa Turkmenistan 
2 nd century BC Parthia was a northeastern Iranian satrapy of the Achaemenid Empire which later passed on to Alexanders empire. Under the Seleucids Parthia was governed by various Greek satraps such as Nicanor and Philip. In 247 BC following the death of Antiochus II Theos Andragoras the Seleucid governor of Parthia proclaimed his independence and began minting coins showing himself wearing a royal diadem and claiming kingship. He ruled until 238 BC when Arsaces the leader of the Parni tribe conquered Parthia killing Andragoras and inaugurating the Arsacid dynasty. Antiochus III recaptured Arsacid controlled territory in 209 BC from Arsaces II. Arsaces II sued for peace and became a vassal of the Seleucids. It was not until the reign of Phraates I c.176171 BC that the Arsacids would again begin to assert their independence.81 During the reign of Mithridates I of Parthia Arsacid control expanded to include Herat in 167 BC Babylonia in 144 BC Media in 141 BC Persia in 139 BC and large parts of Syria in the 1
10 s BC. The SeleucidParthian wars continued as the Seleucids invaded Mesopotamia under Antiochus VII Sidetes reigned 138129 BC but he was eventually killed by a Parthian counterattack. After the fall of the Seleucid dynasty the Parthians fought frequently against neighbouring Rome in the RomanParthian Wars 66 BC  AD 217. Abundant traces of Hellenism continued under the Parthian empire. The Parthians used Greek as well as their own Parthian language though lesser than Greek as languages of administration and also used Greek drachmas as coinage. They enjoyed Greek theater and Greek art influenced Parthian art. The Parthians continued worshipping Greek gods syncretized together with Iranian deities. Their rulers established ruler cults in the manner of Hellenistic kings and often used Hellenistic royal epithets. The Hellenistic influence in Iran was significant in terms of scope but not depth and durabilityunlike the Near East the IranianZoroastrian ideas and ideals remained the main source of inspiration in mainland Iran and was soon revived in late Parthian and Sasanian periods.82 Judeaedit Main article CoeleSyria Further information Hellenistic Judaism and Hasmonean dynasty Reconstruction of the Second Temple in the Holyland Model of Jerusalem During the Hellenistic period Judea became a frontier region between the Seleucid Empire and Ptolemaic Egypt and therefore was often the frontline of the Syrian wars changing hands several times during these conflicts.83 Under the Hellenistic kingdoms Judea was ruled by the hereditary office of the High Priest of Israel as a Hellenistic vassal. This period also saw the rise of a Hellenistic Judaism which first developed in the Jewish diaspora of Alexandria and Antioch and then spread to Judea. The major literary product of this cultural syncretism is the Septuagint translation of the Hebrew Bible from Biblical Hebrew and Biblical Aramaic to Koin Greek. The reason for the production of this translation seems to be that many of the Alexandrian Jews had lost the ability to speak Hebrew and Aramaic.84 Between 301 and 219 BC the Ptolemies ruled Judea in relative peace and Jews often found themselves working in the Ptolemaic administration and army which led to the rise of a Hellenized Jewish elite class e.g. the Tobiads. The wars of Antiochus III brought the region into the Seleucid empire Jerusalem fell to his control in 198 BC and the Temple was repaired and provided with money and tribute.85 Antiochus IV Epiphanes sacked Jerusalem and looted the Temple in 169 BC after disturbances in Judea during his abortive invasion of Egypt. Antiochus then banned key Jewish religious rites and traditions in Judea. He may have been attempting to Hellenize the region and unify his empire and the Jewish resistance to this eventually led to an escalation of violence. Whatever the case tensions between pro and antiSeleucid Jewish factions led to the 174135 BC Maccabean Revolt of Judas Maccabeus whose victory is celebrated in the Jewish festival of Hanukkah.citation needed Modern interpretations see this period as a civil war between Hellenized and orthodox forms of Judaism.8687 Out of this revolt was formed an independent Jewish kingdom known as the Hasmonean dynasty which lasted from 165 BC to 63 BC. The Hasmonean dynasty eventually disintegrated in a civil war which coincided with civil wars in Rome. The last Hasmonean ruler Antigonus II Mattathias was captured by Herod and executed in 37 BC. In spite of originally being a revolt against Greek overlordship the Hasmonean kingdom and also the Herodian kingdom which followed gradually became more and more hellenized. From 37 BC to 4 BC Herod the Great ruled as a JewishRoman client king appointed by the Roman Senate. He considerably enlarged the Temple see Herods Temple making it one of the largest religious structures in the world. The style of the enlarged temple and other Herodian architecture shows significant Hellenistic architectural influence. His son Herod Archelaus ruled from 4 BC to AD 6 when he was deposed for the formation of Roman Judea.citation needed Kingdom of Pontusedit Main article Kingdom of Pontus Bust of Mithridates VI depicted as Herakles. The Kingdom of Pontus was a Hellenistic kingdom on the southern coast of the Black Sea. It was founded by Mithridates I in 291 BC and lasted until its conquest by the Roman Republic in 63 BC. Despite being ruled by a dynasty which was a descendant of the Persian Achaemenid Empire it became hellenized due to the influence of the Greek cities on the Black Sea and its neighboring kingdoms. Pontic culture was a mix of Greek and Iranian elements the most hellenized parts of the kingdom were on the coast populated by Greek colonies such as Trapezus and Sinope the latter of which became the capital of the kingdom. Epigraphic evidence also shows extensive Hellenistic influence in the interior. During the reign of Mithridates II Pontus was allied with the Seleucids through dynastic marriages. By the time of Mithridates VI Eupator Greek was the official language of the kingdom though Anatolian languages continued to be spoken. The kingdom grew to its largest extent under Mithridates VI who conquered Colchis Cappadocia Paphlagonia Bithynia Lesser Armenia the Bosporan Kingdom the Greek colonies of the Tauric Chersonesos and for a brief time the Roman province of Asia. Mithridates himself of mixed Persian and Greek ancestry presented himself as the protector of the Greeks against the barbarians of Rome styling himself as King Mithridates Eupator Dionysus88 and as the great liberator. Mithridates also depicted himself with the anastole hairstyle of Alexander and used the symbolism of Herakles from whom the Macedonian kings claimed descent. After a long struggle with Rome in the Mithridatic wars Pontus was defeated part of it was incorporated into the Roman Republic as the province of Bithynia while Pontus eastern half survived as a client kingdom. Other realmsedit GrecoBactriansedit Main article GrecoBactrian kingdom See also Hellenistic influence on Indian art The GrecoBactrian kingdom at its maximum extent c.180 BC. The Greek kingdom of Bactria began as a breakaway satrapy of the Seleucid empire which because of the size of the empire had significant freedom from central control. Between 255 and 246 BC the governor of Bactria Sogdiana and Margiana most of presentday Afghanistan one Diodotus took this process to its logical extreme and declared himself king. Diodotus II son of Diodotus was overthrown in about 230 BC by Euthydemus possibly the satrap of Sogdiana who then started his own dynasty. In c.210 BC the GrecoBactrian kingdom was invaded by a resurgent Seleucid empire under Antiochus III. While victorious in the field it seems Antiochus came to realise that there were advantages in the status quo perhaps sensing that Bactria could not be governed from Syria and married one of his daughters to Euthydemuss son thus legitimizing the GrecoBactrian dynasty. Soon afterwards the GrecoBactrian kingdom seems to have expanded possibly taking advantage of the defeat of the Parthian king Arsaces II by Antiochus. According to Strabo the GrecoBactrians seem to have had contacts with China through the silk road trade routes Strabo XI.
11.1 . Indian sources also maintain religious contact between Buddhist monks and the Greeks and some GrecoBactrians did convert to Buddhism. Demetrius son and successor of Euthydemus invaded northwestern India in 180 BC after the destruction of the Mauryan Empire there the Mauryans were probably allies of the Bactrians and Seleucids. The exact justification for the invasion remains unclear but by about 175 BC the Greeks ruled over parts of northwestern India. This period also marks the beginning of the obfuscation of GrecoBactrian history. Demetrius possibly died about 180 BC numismatic evidence suggests the existence of several other kings shortly thereafter. It is probable that at this point the GrecoBactrian kingdom split into several semiindependent regions for some years often warring amongst themselves. Heliocles was the last Greek to clearly rule Bactria his power collapsing in the face of central Asian tribal invasions Scythian and Yuezhi by about 130 BC. However Greek urban civilisation seems to have continued in Bactria after the fall of the kingdom having a hellenising effect on the tribes which had displaced Greek rule. The Kushan Empire which followed continued to use Greek on their coinage and Greeks continued being influential in the empire. IndoGreek kingdomsedit Main article IndoGreeks See also IndoGreek religions IndoGreek Kingdoms in 100 BC. The separation of the IndoGreek kingdom from the GrecoBactrian kingdom resulted in an even more isolated position and thus the details of the IndoGreek kingdom are even more obscure than for Bactria. Many supposed kings in India are known only because of coins bearing their name. The numismatic evidence together with archaeological finds and the scant historical records suggest that the fusion of eastern and western cultures reached its peak in the IndoGreek kingdom.citation needed After Demetrius death civil wars between Bactrian kings in India allowed Apollodotus I from c.180175 BC to make himself independent as the first proper IndoGreek king who did not rule from Bactria. Large numbers of his coins have been found in India and he seems to have reigned in Gandhara as well as western Punjab. Apollodotus I was succeeded by or ruled alongside Antimachus II likely the son of the Bactrian king Antimachus I.89 In about 155 or 165 BC he seems to have been succeeded by the most successful of the IndoGreek kings Menander I. Menander converted to Buddhism and seems to have been a great patron of the religion he is remembered in some Buddhist texts as Milinda. He also expanded the kingdom further east into Punjab though these conquests were rather ephemeral.citation needed After the death of Menander c.130 BC the Kingdom appears to have fragmented with several kings attested contemporaneously in different regions. This inevitably weakened the Greek position and territory seems to have been lost progressively. Around 70 BC the western regions of Arachosia and Paropamisadae were lost to tribal invasions presumably by those tribes responsible for the end of the Bactrian kingdom. The resulting IndoScythian kingdom seems to have gradually pushed the remaining IndoGreek kingdom towards the east. The IndoGreek kingdom appears to have lingered on in western Punjab until about AD 10 at which time it was finally ended by the IndoScythians.citation needed Strato III was the last of the dynasty of Diodotus was the last of the line of Diodotus and independent Hellenistic king to rule at his death in 10 AD.9091 After conquering the IndoGreeks the Kushan empire took over GrecoBuddhism the Greek language Greek script Greek coinage and artistic styles. Greeks continued being an important part of the cultural world of India for generations. The depictions of the Buddha appear to have been influenced by Greek culture Buddha representations in the Ghandara period often showed Buddha under the protection of Herakles.92 Several references in Indian literature praise the knowledge of the Yavanas or the Greeks. The Mahabharata compliments them as the allknowing Yavanas sarvaj yavan e.g. The Yavanas O king are allknowing the Suras are particularly so. The mlecchas are wedded to the creations of their own fancy93 such as flying machines that are generally called vimanas. The BrihatSamhita of the mathematician Varahamihira says The Greeks though impure must be honored since they were trained in sciences and therein excelled others....94 Rise of Romeedit This section needs additional citations for verification. Please help improve this article by adding citations to reliable sources in this section. Unsourced material may be challenged and removed. February 2021 Learn how and when to remove this message King Perseus of Macedon in front of Aemilius Paulus by JeanFranois Pierre Peyron from 1802 Museum of Fine Arts Budapest. Widespread Roman interference in the Greek world was probably inevitable given the general manner of the ascendancy of the Roman Republic. This RomanGreek interaction began as a consequence of the Greek citystates located along the coast of southern Italy. Rome had come to dominate the Italian peninsula and desired the submission of the Greek cities to its rule. Although they initially resisted allying themselves with Pyrrhus of Epirus and defeating the Romans at several battles the Greek cities were unable to maintain this position and were absorbed by the Roman republic. Shortly afterward Rome became involved in Sicily fighting against the Carthaginians in the First Punic War. The result was the complete conquest of Sicily including its previously powerful Greek cities by the Romans. After the Second Punic War the Romans looked to reassert their influence in the Balkans and to curb the expansion of Philip V of Macedon. A pretext for war was provided by Philips refusal to end his war with Attalid Pergamum and Rhodes both Roman allies.95 The Romans also allied with the Aetolian League of Greek citystates which resented Philips power thus declared war on Macedon in 200 BC starting the Second Macedonian War. This ended with a decisive Roman victory at the Battle of Cynoscephalae 197 BC. Like most Roman peace treaties of the period the resultant Peace of Flaminius was designed utterly to crush the power of the defeated party a massive indemnity was levied Philips fleet was surrendered to Rome and Macedon was effectively returned to its ancient boundaries losing influence over the citystates of southern Greece and land in Thrace and Asia Minor. The result was the end of Macedon as a major power in the Mediterranean. In less than twenty years Rome had destroyed the power of one of the successor states crippled another and firmly entrenched its influence over Greece. This was primarily a result of the overambition of the Macedonian kings and their unintended provocation of Rome though Rome was quick to exploit the situation. In another twenty years the Macedonian kingdom was no more. Seeking to reassert Macedonian power and Greek independence Philip Vs son Perseus incurred the wrath of the Romans resulting in the Third Macedonian War 171168 BC. Victorious the Romans abolished the Macedonian kingdom replacing it with four puppet republics until it was formally annexed as a Roman province after yet another rebellion under Andriscus. Rome now demanded that the Achaean League the last stronghold of Greek independence be dissolved. The Achaeans refused and declared war on Rome. Most of the Greek cities rallied to the Achaeans side even slaves were freed to fight for Greek independence. The Roman consul Lucius Mummius advanced from Macedonia and defeated the Greeks at Corinth which was razed to the ground. In 146 BC the Greek peninsula though not the islands became a Roman protectorate. Roman taxes were imposed except in Athens and Sparta and all the cities had to accept rule by Romes local allies. The Roman Republic and contemporary polities in 100 BC The Attalid dynasty of Pergamum lasted little longer a Roman ally until the end its final king Attalus III died in 133 BC without an heir and taking the alliance to its natural conclusion willed Pergamum to the Roman Republic.96 The final Greek resistance came in 88 BC when King Mithridates of Pontus rebelled against Rome captured Roman held Anatolia and massacred up to 100000 Romans and Roman allies across Asia Minor. Many Greek cities including Athens overthrew their Roman puppet rulers and joined him in the Mithridatic wars. When he was driven out of Greece by the Roman general Lucius Cornelius Sulla the latter laid siege to Athens and razed the city. Mithridates was finally defeated by Gnaeus Pompeius Magnus Pompey the Great in 65 BC. Further ruin was brought to Greece by the Roman civil wars which were partly fought in Greece. Finally in 27 BC Augustus directly annexed Greece to the new Roman Empire as the province of Achaea. The struggles with Rome had left Greece depopulated and demoralised. Nevertheless Roman rule at least brought an end to warfare and cities such as Athens Corinth Thessaloniki and Patras soon recovered their prosperity. Eventually instability in the near east resulting from the power vacuum left by the collapse of the Seleucid Empire caused the Roman proconsul Pompey the Great to abolish the Seleucid rump state absorbing much of Syria into the Roman Republic.96 Famously the end of Ptolemaic Egypt came as the final act in the republican civil war between the Roman triumvirs Mark Anthony and Augustus Caesar. After the defeat of Anthony and his lover the last Ptolemaic monarch Cleopatra VII at the Battle of Actium Augustus invaded Egypt and took it as his own personal fiefdom.96 He thereby completed the destruction of the Hellenistic kingdoms and transformed the Roman Republic into a monarchy ending in hindsight the Hellenistic era. Hellenistic cultureedit This section needs additional citations for verification. Please help improve this article by adding citations to reliable sources in this section. Unsourced material may be challenged and removed. February 2021 Learn how and when to remove this message Spreadedit Statuette of Nike Greek goddess of victory from Vani Georgia. Greek culture was at its height of world influence in the Hellenistic period. Hellenism or at least Philhellenism reached most regions on the frontiers of the Hellenistic kingdoms. Though some of these regions were not ruled by Greeks or even Greek speaking elites Hellenistic influence can be seen in the historical record and material culture of these regions. Other regions had established contact with Greek colonies before this period and simply saw a continued process of Hellenization and intermixing.9798 The spread of Greek culture and language throughout the Near East and Asia owed much to the development of newly founded cities and deliberate colonization policies by the successor states which in turn was necessary for maintaining their military forces. Settlements such as AiKhanoum on trade routes allowed Greek culture to mix and spread. The language of Philip IIs and Alexanders court and army which was made up of various Greek and nonGreek speaking peoples was a version of Attic Greek and over time this language developed into Koine the lingua franca of the successor states. The spread of Greek influence and language is also shown through ancient Greek coinage. Portraits became more realistic and the obverse of the coin was often used to display a propagandistic image commemorating an event or displaying the image of a favored god. The use of Greekstyle portraits and Greek language continued under the Roman Parthian and Kushan empires even as the use of Greek was in decline.99100 Institutionsedit In some fields Hellenistic culture thrived particularly in its preservation of the past. The states of the Hellenistic period were deeply fixated with the past and its seemingly lost glories.101 The preservation of many classical and archaic works of art and literature including the works of the three great classical tragedians Aeschylus Sophocles and Euripides are due to the efforts of the Hellenistic Greeks. The museum and library of Alexandria was the center of this conservationist activity. With the support of royal stipends Alexandrian scholars collected translated copied classified and critiqued every book they could find. Most of the great literary figures of the Hellenistic period studied at Alexandria and conducted research there. They were scholar poets writing not only poetry but treatises on Homer and other archaic and classical Greek literature.102 Athens retained its position as the most prestigious seat of higher education especially in the domains of philosophy and rhetoric with considerable libraries and philosophical schools.103 Alexandria had the monumental museum a research center and Library of Alexandria which was estimated to have had 700000 volumes.103 The city of Pergamon also had a large library and became a major center of book production.103 The island of Rhodes had a library and also boasted a famous finishing school for politics and diplomacy. Libraries were also present in Antioch Pella and Kos. Cicero was educated in Athens and Mark Antony in Rhodes.103 Antioch was founded as a metropolis and center of Greek learning which retained its status into the era of Christianity.103 Seleucia replaced Babylon as the metropolis of the lower Tigris. The identification of local gods with similar Greek deities a practice termed Interpretatio graeca stimulated the building of Greekstyle temples and Greek culture in the cities meant that buildings such as gymnasia and theaters became common. Many cities maintained nominal autonomy while under the rule of the local king or satrap and often had Greekstyle institutions. Greek dedications statues architecture and inscriptions have all been found. However local cultures were not replaced and mostly went on as before but now with a new GrecoMacedonian or otherwise Hellenized elite. An example that shows the spread of Greek theater is Plutarchs story of the death of Crassus in which his head was taken to the Parthian court and used as a prop in a performance of The Bacchae. Theaters have also been found for example in AiKhanoum on the edge of Bactria the theater has 35 rows  larger than the theater in Babylon. Hellenization and acculturationedit Further information Hellenization One of the first representations of the Buddha and an example of GrecoBuddhist art 
1 st
2 nd century AD Gandhara Standing Buddha Tokyo National Museum. The concept of Hellenization meaning the adoption of Greek culture in nonGreek regions has long been controversial. Undoubtedly Greek influence did spread through the Hellenistic realms but to what extent and whether this was a deliberate policy or mere cultural diffusion have been hotly debated. It seems likely that Alexander himself pursued policies which led to Hellenization such as the foundations of new cities and Greek colonies. While it may have been a deliberate attempt to spread Greek culture or as Arrian says to civilise the natives it is more likely that it was a series of pragmatic measures designed to aid in the rule of his enormous empire.24 Cities and colonies were centers of administrative control and Macedonian power in a newly conquered region. Alexander also seems to have attempted to create a mixed GrecoPersian elite class as shown by the Susa weddings and his adoption of some forms of Persian dress and court culture. He also brought Persian and other nonGreek peoples into his military and even the elite cavalry units of the companion cavalry. Again it is probably better to see these policies as a pragmatic response to the demands of ruling a large empire24 than to any idealized attempt to bringing Greek culture to the barbarians. This approach was bitterly resented by the Macedonians and discarded by most of the Diadochi after Alexanders death. These policies can also be interpreted as the result of Alexanders possible megalomania104 during his later years. After Alexanders death in 323 BC the influx of Greek colonists into the new realms continued to spread Greek culture into Asia. The founding of new cities and military colonies continued to be a major part of the Successors struggle for control of any particular region and these continued to be centers of cultural diffusion. The spread of Greek culture under the Successors seems mostly to have occurred with the spreading of Greeks themselves rather than as an active policy. Throughout the Hellenistic world these GrecoMacedonian colonists considered themselves by and large superior to the native barbarians and excluded most nonGreeks from the upper echelons of courtly and government life. Most of the native population was not Hellenized had little access to Greek culture and often found themselves discriminated against by their Hellenic overlords.105 Gymnasiums and their Greek education for example were for Greeks only. Greek cities and colonies may have exported Greek art and architecture as far as the Indus but these were mostly enclaves of Greek culture for the transplanted Greek elite. The degree of influence that Greek culture had throughout the Hellenistic kingdoms was therefore highly localized and based mostly on a few great cities like Alexandria and Antioch. Some natives did learn Greek and adopt Greek ways but this was mostly limited to a few local elites who were allowed to retain their posts by the Diadochi and also to a small number of midlevel administrators who acted as intermediaries between the Greek speaking upper class and their subjects. In the Seleucid Empire for example this group amounted to only 
2.5  percent of the official class.106 Hellenistic art nevertheless had a considerable influence on the cultures that had been affected by the Hellenistic expansion. As far as the Indian subcontinent Hellenistic influence on Indian art was broad and farreaching and had effects for several centuries following the forays of Alexander the Great. Despite their initial reluctance the Successors seem to have later deliberately naturalized themselves to their different regions presumably in order to help maintain control of the population.107 In the Ptolemaic kingdom we find some Egyptianized Greeks by the 
2 nd century onwards. In the IndoGreek kingdom we find kings who were converts to Buddhism e.g. Menander. The Greeks in the regions therefore gradually become localized adopting local customs as appropriate. In this way hybrid Hellenistic cultures naturally emerged at least among the upper echelons of society. The trends of Hellenization were therefore accompanied by Greeks adopting native ways over time but this was widely varied by place and by social class. The farther away from the Mediterranean and the lower in social status the more likely that a colonist was to adopt local ways while the GrecoMacedonian elites and royal families usually remained thoroughly Greek and viewed most nonGreeks with disdain. It was not until Cleopatra VII that a Ptolemaic ruler bothered to learn the Egyptian language of their subjects. Terracotta armyedit The Acrobats some of the most naturalistic statues of the Chinese Terracotta Army 210209 BC Since the time of their discovery the figures of the Chinese Terracotta Army 210209 BC have been noted for their exceptional stylistic realism and individualism.108109 The earliest note on this aspect was that of 
20 th century art historian German Hafner who in 1986 was the first to speculate on a possible Hellenistic link to these sculptures due to the unusual display of naturalism relative to general Qin era sculpture the art of the terracotta army originated from Western contact originated from knowledge of Alexander the Great and the splendor of Greek art.110 This idea was also generally supported by Duan Qingbo director of the excavation team at the First Emperors necropolis between 1998 and 2008110 or by Professor Lukas Nickel of SOAS.111 Li Xiuzhen senior archaeologist from the Mausoleum Site Museum acknowledged Western influence but insisted on Chinese authorship We now think the Terracotta Army the acrobats and the bronze sculptures found on site were inspired by ancient Greek sculptures and art112 but although the terracotta warriors may be inspired by Western culture they were uniquely made by the Chinese and we found no Greek names on the backs of Terracotta Warriors which supports my idea that there was no Greek artisan training the local sculptors.113 Others have argued that such speculations rest on flawed and old Eurocentric ideas that assumed other civilizations were incapable of sophisticated artistry and thus foreign artistry must be seen through Western traditions.114 Religionedit Main article Hellenistic religion Bust of ZeusAmmon a deity with attributes from Greek and Egyptian gods. In the Hellenistic period there was much continuity in Greek religion the Greek gods continued to be worshiped and the same rites were practiced as before. However the sociopolitical changes brought on by the conquest of the Persian empire and Greek emigration abroad meant that change also came to religious practices. This varied greatly by location. Athens Sparta and most cities in the Greek mainland did not see much religious change or new gods with the exception of the Egyptian Isis in Athens115 while the multiethnic Alexandria had a very varied group of gods and religious practices including Egyptian Jewish and Greek. Greek emigres brought their Greek religion everywhere they went even as far as India and Afghanistan. NonGreeks also had more freedom to travel and trade throughout the Mediterranean and in this period we can see Egyptian gods such as Serapis and the Syrian gods Atargatis and Hadad as well as a Jewish synagogue all coexisting on the island of Delos alongside classical Greek deities.116 A common practice was to identify Greek gods with native gods that had similar characteristics and this created new fusions like ZeusAmmon Aphrodite Hagne a Hellenized Atargatis and IsisDemeter. Greek emigres faced individual religious choices they had not faced on their home cities where the gods they worshiped were dictated by tradition. Hellenistic monarchies were closely associated with the religious life of the kingdoms they ruled. This had already been a feature of Macedonian kingship which had priestly duties.117 Hellenistic kings adopted patron deities as protectors of their house and sometimes claimed descent from them. The Seleucids for example took on Apollo as patron the Antigonids had Herakles and the Ptolemies claimed Dionysus among others.118 The worship of dynastic ruler cults was also a feature of this period most notably in Egypt where the Ptolemies adopted earlier Pharaonic practice and established themselves as godkings. These cults were usually associated with a specific temple in honor of the ruler such as the Ptolemaieia at Alexandria and had their own festivals and theatrical performances. The setting up of ruler cults was more based on the systematized honors offered to the kings sacrifice proskynesis statues altars hymns which put them on par with the gods isotheism than on actual belief of their divine nature. According to Peter Green these cults did not produce genuine belief of the divinity of rulers among the Greeks and Macedonians.119 The worship of Alexander was also popular as in the long lived cult at Erythrae and of course at Alexandria where his tomb was located. The Hellenistic age also saw a rise in the disillusionment with traditional religion.120 The rise of philosophy and the sciences had removed the gods from many of their traditional domains such as their role in the movement of the heavenly bodies and natural disasters. The Sophists proclaimed the centrality of humanity and agnosticism the belief in Euhemerism the view that the gods were simply ancient kings and heroes became popular. The popular philosopher Epicurus promoted a view of disinterested gods living far away from the human realm in metakosmia. The apotheosis of rulers also brought the idea of divinity down to earth. While there does seem to have been a substantial decline in religiosity this was mostly reserved for the educated classes.121 Magic was practiced widely and this too was a continuation from earlier times. Throughout the Hellenistic world people would consult oracles and use charms and figurines to deter misfortune or to cast spells. Also developed in this era was the complex system of astrology which sought to determine a persons character and future in the movements of the sun moon and planets. Astrology was widely associated with the cult of Tyche luck fortune which grew in popularity during this period. Literatureedit Relief with Menander and New Comedy Masks Roman AD 4060. The masks show three New Comedy stock characters youth false maiden old man. Princeton University Art Museum The Hellenistic period saw the rise of New Comedy the only few surviving representative texts being those of Menander born 342341 BC. Only one play Dyskolos survives in its entirety. The plots of this new Hellenistic comedy of manners were more domestic and formulaic stereotypical low born characters such as slaves became more important the language was colloquial and major motifs included escapism marriage romance and luck Tyche.122 Though no Hellenistic tragedy remains intact they were still widely produced during the period yet it seems that there was no major breakthrough in style remaining within the classical model. The Supplementum Hellenisticum a modern collection of extant fragments contains the fragments of 150 authors.123 An ancient fresco depicting a poet thought to be Euphorion and a female reading a diptych Hellenistic poets now sought patronage from kings and wrote works in their honor. The scholars at the libraries in Alexandria and Pergamon focused on the collection cataloging and literary criticism of classical Athenian works and ancient Greek myths. The poetcritic Callimachus a staunch elitist wrote hymns equating Ptolemy II to Zeus and Apollo. He promoted short poetic forms such as the epigram epyllion and the iambic and attacked epic as base and common big book big evil was his doctrine.124 He also wrote a massive catalog of the holdings of the library of Alexandria the famous Pinakes. Callimachus was extremely influential in his time and also for the development of Augustan poetry. Another poet Apollonius of Rhodes attempted to revive the epic for the Hellenistic world with his Argonautica. He had been a student of Callimachus and later became chief librarian prostates of the library of Alexandria. Apollonius and Callimachus spent much of their careers feuding with each other. Pastoral poetry also thrived during the Hellenistic era Theocritus was a major poet who popularized the genre. Around 240 BC Livius Andronicus a Greek slave from southern Italy translated Homers Odyssey into Latin. Greek literature would have a dominant effect on the development of the Latin literature of the Romans. The poetry of Virgil Horace and Ovid were all based on Hellenistic styles. Philosophyedit Main article Hellenistic philosophy Zeno of Citium founded Stoic philosophy. During the Hellenistic period many different schools of thought developed and these schools of Hellenistic philosophy had a significant influence on the Greek and Roman ruling elite. Athens with its multiple philosophical schools continued to remain the center of philosophical thought. However Athens had now lost her political freedom and Hellenistic philosophy is a reflection of this new difficult period. In this political climate Hellenistic philosophers went in search of goals such as ataraxia undisturbedness autarky selfsufficiency and apatheia freedom from suffering which would allow them to wrest wellbeing or eudaimonia out of the most difficult turns of fortune. This occupation with the inner life with personal inner liberty and with the pursuit of eudaimonia is what all Hellenistic philosophical schools have in common.125 The Epicureans and the Cynics eschewed public offices and civic service which amounted to a rejection of the polis itself the defining institution of the Greek world. Epicurus promoted atomism and an asceticism based on freedom from pain as its ultimate goal. The Cyrenaics and Epicureans embraced hedonism arguing that pleasure was the only true good. Cynics such as Diogenes of Sinope rejected all material possessions and social conventions nomos as unnatural and useless. Stoicism founded by Zeno of Citium taught that virtue was sufficient for eudaimonia as it would allow one to live in accordance with Nature or Logos. The philosophical schools of Aristotle the Peripatetics of the Lyceum and Plato Platonism at the Academy also remained influential. Against these dogmatic schools of philosophy the Pyrrhonist school embraced philosophical skepticism and starting with Arcesilaus Platos Academy also embraced skepticism in the form of Academic Skepticism. The spread of Christianity throughout the Roman world followed by the spread of Islam ushered in the end of Hellenistic philosophy and the beginnings of Medieval philosophy often forcefully as under Justinian I which was dominated by the three Abrahamic traditions Jewish philosophy Christian philosophy and early Islamic philosophy. In spite of this shift Hellenistic philosophy continued to influence these three religious traditions and the Renaissance thought which followed them. Sciencesedit Further information Hellenistic astronomy Hellenistic mathematics and Hellenistic geography One of the oldest surviving fragments of Euclids Elements found at Oxyrhynchus and dated to c.AD 100 P. Oxy. 29. The diagram accompanies Book II Proposition 
5.1 26 Science in the Hellenistic age differed from that of the previous era in at least two ways first it benefited from the crossfertilization of Greek ideas with those that had developed in older civilizations secondly to some extent it was supported by royal patrons in the kingdoms founded by Alexanders successors. The cultural competition among the Hellenistic kingdoms produced seats of learning throughout the Mediterranean of which the most important was Alexandria in Egypt which became a major center of scholarship in the 
3 rd century BC. In their scientific investigations Hellenistic scholars frequently employed the principles developed earlier in ancient Greece the application of mathematics to natural phenomena and the undertaking of deliberate empirical research.127128 In mathematics Hellenistic geometers built upon the work of mathematicians from the previous generation such as Theodorus Archytas Theaetetus and Eudoxus. Euclid whose Elements became the most important textbook in Western mathematics until the 
19 th century presented proofs for the Pythagorean Theorem for the infinitude of primes and for the five Platonic solids.129 Archimedes made use of a technique dependent on proof by contradiction to solve problems with an arbitrary degree of accuracy. Known as the method of exhaustion Archimedes used it in several of his works including to approximate the value of  Measurement of the Circle and to prove that the area enclosed by a parabola and a straight line is 43 times the area of a triangle with equal base and height Quadrature of the Parabola.130131 The most characteristic product of Hellenistic mathematics was the theory of conic sections reaching its greatest achievement in the work of Apollonius. It made no explicit use of either algebra or trigonometry the latter appearing around the time of Hipparchus.132 In the exact sciences Eratosthenes measured the Earths circumference and calculated the tilt of the Earths axis with remarkable accuracy.133 He might have also determined the distance from the Earth to the Sun and invented the leap day.134 Eratosthenes drew a map of the world incorporating parallels and meridians based on the available geographical knowledge of the era. Another important figure is the astronomer Hipparchus who used Babylonian astronomical data and discovered the phenomena of Earths precession. Pliny reports that Hipparchus produced the first systematic star catalog after he observed a new star wishing to preserve astronomical record of the stars so that new ones could be discovered.135 A celestial globe based on Hipparchus star catalog presumably sits atop the broad shoulders of a large 
2 ndcentury Roman statue known as the Farnese Atlas.136 Another astronomer Aristarchos of Samos measured the distances of the Earth Sun and Moon and developed a heliocentric theory. In mechanics Ctesibius wrote the first treatises on the science of compressed air and its uses in pumps and allegedly designed a kind of cannon as reported by Hero of Alexandria.137138 In the life sciences medicine made significant advances within the framework of the Hippocratic tradition. Praxagoras theorized that blood traveled through the veins while Herophilos and Erasistratus performed dissections and vivisections of humans and animals providing accurate descriptions of the nervous system liver and other key organs. Influenced by Philinus of Cos a student of Herophilos the Empiric school of medicine focused on strict observation and rejected the unseen causes of the Dogmatic school. In botany Theophrastus was known for his work in plant classification while Crateuas wrote a compendium on botanic pharmacy. The library of Alexandria presumably included a zoo for research and Hellenistic zoologists include Archelaos Leonidas of Byzantion Apollodoros of Alexandria and Bion of Soloi.139 The technological achievement of the Hellenistic age is masterly displayed in the Antikythera mechanism a 
37 gear mechanical analog computer which calculated the motions of the Sun Moon and planets including lunar and solar eclipses.140 Devices of this sort are not found again until the 
10 th century when a simpler eightgeared lunisolar calculator incorporated into an astrolabe was described by the Persian scholar AlBiruni.141 Similarly complex devices were also developed by other Muslim engineers and astronomers during the Middle Ages.140 Other technological developments of the Hellenistic age include cogged gears pulleys Archimedes screw the screw press glassblowing hollow bronze casting surveying instruments the odometer the pantograph the water clock the watermill the water organ and the piston pump. Past interpretations of Hellenistic science often downplayed its significance as found for instance in the English classical scholar Francis Cornford who believed that all the most important and original work was done in the three centuries from 600 to 300 BC.142 Recent interpretations tend to be more generous leading a few people like mathematician Lucio Russo to claim that the scientific method was actually born in the 
3 rd century BC to be largely forgotten during the Roman period and only revived in full during the Renaissance.143 Military scienceedit Further information Hellenistic armies Ancient mechanical artillery Catapults standing the chain drive of Polybolos bottom center Gastraphetes on wall Hellenistic warfare was a continuation of the military developments of Iphicrates and Philip II of Macedon particularly his use of the Macedonian phalanx a dense formation of pikemen in conjunction with heavy companion cavalry. Armies of the Hellenistic period differed from those of the classical period in being largely made up of professional soldiers and also in their greater specialization and technical proficiency in siege warfare. Hellenistic armies were significantly larger than those of classical Greece relying increasingly on Greek mercenaries misthophoroi menforpay and also on nonGreek soldiery such as Thracians Galatians Egyptians and Iranians. Some ethnic groups were known for their martial skill in a particular mode of combat and were highly sought after including Tarantine cavalry Cretan archers Rhodian slingers and Thracian peltasts. This period also saw the adoption of new weapons and troop types such as Thureophoroi and the Thorakitai who used the oval Thureos shield and fought with javelins and the machaira sword. The use of heavily armored cataphracts and also horse archers was adopted by the Seleucids GrecoBactrians Armenians and Pontus. The use of war elephants also became common. Seleucus received Indian war elephants from the Mauryan empire and used them to good effect at the battle of Ipsus. He kept a core of 500 of them at Apameia. The Ptolemies used the smaller African elephant. Hellenistic military equipment was generally characterized by an increase in size. Hellenisticera warships grew from the trireme to include more banks of oars and larger numbers of rowers and soldiers as in the Quadrireme and Quinquereme. The Ptolemaic Tessarakonteres was the largest ship constructed in Antiquity. New siege engines were developed during this period. An unknown engineer developed the torsionspring catapult c.360 BC and Dionysios of Alexandria designed a repeating ballista the Polybolos. Preserved examples of ball projectiles range from 
4.4  to 78 kg 
9.7  to 1
72.0  lb.144 Demetrius Poliorcetes was notorious for the large siege engines employed in his campaigns especially during the 
12 month siege of Rhodes when he had Epimachos of Athens build a massive 160 ton siege tower named Helepolis filled with artillery. Artedit Main articles Hellenistic art and Hellenistic sculpture Head of an old woman a good example of realism. The term Hellenistic is a modern invention the Hellenistic World not only included a huge area covering the whole of the Aegean rather than the Classical Greece focused on the Poleis of Athens and Sparta but also a huge time range. In artistic terms this means that there is huge variety which is often put under the heading of Hellenistic Art for convenience. Hardly any examples of Hellenistic painting survive but we have many Roman copies of Hellenistic sculpture and some originals including Laocon and his Sons the Venus de Milo and the Winged Victory of Samothrace. Hellenistic art saw a turn from the idealistic perfected calm and composed figures of classical Greek art to a style dominated by realism and the depiction of emotion pathos and character ethos. The motif of deceptively realistic naturalism in art aletheia is reflected in stories such as that of the painter Zeuxis who was said to have painted grapes that seemed so real that birds came and pecked at them.145 The female nude also became more popular as epitomized by the Aphrodite of Cnidos of Praxiteles and art in general became more erotic e.g. Leda and the Swan and Scopas Pothos. The dominant ideals of Hellenistic art were those of sensuality and passion.146 People of all ages and social statuses were depicted in the art of the Hellenistic age. Artists such as Peiraikos chose mundane and lower class subjects for his paintings. According to Pliny He painted barbers shops cobblers stalls asses eatables and similar subjects earning for himself the name of rhyparographos painter of dirtlow things. In these subjects he could give consummate pleasure selling them for more than other artists received for their large pictures Natural History Book XXXV.112. Even barbarians such as the Galatians were depicted in heroic form prefiguring the artistic theme of the noble savage. The image of Alexander the Great was also an important artistic theme and all of the diadochi had themselves depicted imitating Alexanders youthful look. Developments in painting included experiments in chiaroscuro by Zeuxis and the development of landscape painting and still life painting.147 Greek temples built during the Hellenistic period were generally larger than classical ones such as the temple of Artemis at Ephesus the temple of Artemis at Sardis and the temple of Apollo at Didyma rebuilt by Seleucus in 300 BC. The royal palace basileion also came into its own during the Hellenistic period the first extant example being the massive 
4 thcentury villa of Cassander at Vergina. This period also saw the first written works of art history in the histories of Duris of Samos and Xenocrates of Athens a sculptor and a historian of sculpture and painting. There has been a trend in writing the history of this period to depict Hellenistic art as a decadent style following the Golden Age of Classical Athens. Pliny the Elder after having described the sculpture of the classical period says Cessavit deinde ars then art disappeared.148 The 
18 th century terms Baroque and Rococo have sometimes been applied to the art of this complex and individual period. The renewal of the historiographical approach as well as some recent discoveries such as the tombs of Vergina allow a better appreciation of this periods artistic richness. Sportedit A lion hunt on a mosaic floor from Pella in Macedonia. Last quarter of the 
4 th century BC Pella Archaeological Museum. Throughout the Hellenistic period several sports were practiced and promoted across the different cities and kingdoms of the time. Hunting was both a favorite pastime of the Macedonian kings and nobles of that age and a favorite subject for paintings. In Egypt the Ptolemaic kings sponsored new athletic festivals and subsidize Egyptian or Alexandrian athletes at major competitions.149 Egyptian kings also provided funds for athletic facilities to be built which housed ephebic education and encouraged citizens to partake in gymnasium classes. Ptolemaic and other Hellenistic royals often competed at athletic competitions like The Olympics or other Panathenaic games. Females during the Hellenistic period were often given opportunities to show off they athletic abilities in similar ways to men. In Egypt Ptolemaic females were well known in terms of court and during equestrian competitions. Despite females being banned from watching sports and events like the male Olympics in Hellenistic Empires female sport especially equestrian sport flourished. Discoveries of poems in 2001 depicted eighteen different wins for equestrian sport. These wins took place at competitions like Olympia and Athens and all originated from the royal court. Several of these wins resulted from women and confirmed the desires and selfrepresentation of Hellenistic rulers as they tried to influence the Greek World.150 Other forms of leisure activities included public presentations and demonstrations. These performances were often orchestrated by the royals for their own enjoyment. It is noted that these events were catered for both the female and male audiences. These events would often contain displays of exotic animals and other paraphernalia that aided to display their wealth and the territories that they controlled. While empires during the Hellenistic period ruled they witnessed expansion of crown or Iso equal to major athletic festivals.149 This movement as well as the public displays for royalty were both trends what would continue into the Roman Empire. Legacyedit The focus on the Hellenistic period over the course of the 
19 th century by scholars and historians has led to an issue common to the study of historical periods historians see the period of focus as a mirror of the period in which they are living. Many 
19 thcentury scholars contended that the Hellenistic period represented a cultural decline from the brilliance of classical Greece. Though this comparison is now seen as unfair and meaningless it has been noted that even commentators of the time saw the end of a cultural era which could not be matched again.151 This may be inextricably linked with the nature of government. It has been noted by Herodotus that after the establishment of the Athenian democracy the Athenians found themselves suddenly a great power. Not just in one field but in everything they set their minds to ... As subjects of a tyrant what had they accomplished ...Held down like slaves they had shirked and slacked once they had won their freedom not a citizen but he could feel like he was labouring for himself152 Thus with the decline of the Greek polis and the establishment of monarchical states the environment and social freedom in which to excel may have been reduced.153 A parallel can be drawn with the productivity of the city states of Italy during the Renaissance and their subsequent decline under autocratic rulers.citation needed However William Woodthorpe Tarn between World War I and World War II and the heyday of the League of Nations focused on the issues of racial and cultural confrontation and the nature of colonial rule. Michael Rostovtzeff who fled the Russian Revolution concentrated predominantly on the rise of the capitalist bourgeoisie in areas of Greek rule. Arnaldo Momigliano an Italian Jew who wrote before and after the Second World War studied the problem of mutual understanding between races in the conquered areas. Moses Hadas portrayed an optimistic picture of synthesis of culture from the perspective of the 19
50 s while Frank William Walbank in the 19
60 s and 19
70 s had a materialistic approach to the Hellenistic period focusing mainly on class relations. Recently however papyrologist C. Praux has concentrated predominantly on the economic system interactions between kings and cities and provides a generally pessimistic view on the period. Peter Green on the other hand writes from the point of view of late
20 thcentury liberalism his focus being on individualism the breakdown of convention experiments and a postmodern disillusionment with all institutions and political processes.19 Influence on Christianityedit Alexanders conquests helped the spread of Christianity from Greek . One of Alexanders generals Seleucus I Nicator who controlled most of Asia Minor Syria Mesopotamia and the Iranian Plateau after Alexanders death founded Antioch which is known as the cradle of Christianity since the name Christian for Jesus followers first emerged there. The New Testament of the Bible from Koine Greek   t bibla the books was written in Koine Greek.154 See alsoedit Ancient Greece portal Ancient Carthage GrecoRoman world Hellenism Academia Hellenism neoclassicism Hellenistic fortifications Hellenistic glass Humanism La Tne culture PreRoman Iron Age Referencesedit  CHAMBERS Dictionary of WORLD HISTORY  Art of the Hellenistic Age and the Hellenistic Tradition. Heilbrunn Timeline of Art History Metropolitan Museum of Art 2013. Retrieved 27 May 2013. Archived here.  Hellenistic Age. Encyclopdia Britannica 2013. Retrieved 27 May 2013. Archived here.  Alexander the Great and the Hellenistic Age. www.penfield.edu. Retrieved 20171008.  Professor Gerhard Rempel Hellenistic Civilization Western New England College Archived 20080705 at the Wayback Machine.  Ulrich Wilcken Griechische Geschichte im Rahmen der Altertumsgeschichte.  Green 2008 pp. xvxvii.  Hellenistic Age. Encyclopdia Britannica Online. Encyclopdia Britannica Inc. Retrieved 8 September 2012.  a b Green P 2008. Alexander The Great and the Hellenistic Age. Phoenix. p. xiii. ISBN 9780753824139.  Chaniotis Angelos 2018. Age of Conquests The Greek World from Alexander to Hadrian. Cambridge MA Harvard University Press. p. 4.  Anderson Terence J. Twining William 2015. Law and archaeology Modified Wigmorean Analysis. In Chapman Robert Wylie Alison eds.. Material Evidence Learning from Archaeological Practice. Abingdon UK New York NY Routledge. p. 290. ISBN 9781317576228. Retrieved 20 August 2019.  . Liddell Henry George Scott Robert A GreekEnglish Lexicon at the Perseus Project.  Chaniotis Angelos 2011. Greek History Hellenistic. Oxford Bibliographies Online Research Guide. Oxford University Press. p. 8. ISBN 9780199805075.  Arnold Matthew 1869. Chapter IV. Culture and Anarchy. Smith Elder  Co. p. 143.  Arnold Matthew 2006. Chapter IV. In Garnett Jane ed.. Culture and Anarchy. Oxford University Press. p. 96. ISBN 9780192805119.  a b F.W. Walbank et al. THE CAMBRIDGE ANCIENT HISTORY SECOND EDITION VOLUME VII PART I The Hellenistic World p. 1.  Bury p. 684.full citation needed  Green Peter 2008. Alexander The Great and the Hellenistic Age. London Orion. ISBN 9780753824139.  a b Green Peter 2007. The Hellenistic Age A Short History. New York Modern Library Chronicles.  Green Peter 1990 Alexander to Actium the historical evolution of the Hellenistic age. University of California Press. pp. 78.  Green p. 9.  Green p. 14.  a b Esposito Gabriele 2019. Armies of the Hellenistic states 323 BC to AD 30 history organization  equipment. Barnsley South Yorkshire Pen  Sword Military. ISBN 9781526730299.  a b c Green p. 21.  Green pp. 3031.  Green p. 126.  Green p. 129.  Green p. 134.  Green p. 199  Bugh Glenn R. editor. The Cambridge Companion to the Hellenistic World 2007. p. 35  Green Peter Alexander to Actium the historical evolution of the Hellenistic age p. 11.  McGing BC. The Foreign Policy of Mithridates VI Eupator King of Pontus p. 17.  Green p. 139.  Berthold Richard M. Rhodes in the Hellenistic Age Cornell University Press 1984 p. 12.  Stanley M. Burstein Walter Donlan Jennifer Tolbert Roberts and Sarah B. Pomeroy. A Brief History of Ancient Greece Politics Society and Culture. Oxford University Press p. 255  The Cambridge Ancient History Volume 6 The Fourth Century BC by D. M. Lewis Editor John Boardman Editor Simon Hornblower Editor M. Ostwald Editor ISBN 0521233488 1994 p. 423 Through contact with their Greek neighbors some Illyrian tribe became bilingual Strabo Vii.
7.8 .Diglottoi in particular the Bylliones and the Taulantian tribes close to Epidamnus  Dalmatia research in the Roman province 19702001  papers in honour of J.J by David Davison Vincent L. Gaffney J. J. Wilkes Emilio Marin 2006 p. 21 ...completely Hellenised town...  The Illyrians history and culture History and Culture Series The Illyrians History and Culture Aleksandar Stipevi ISBN 0815550529 1977 p. 174  The Illyrians The Peoples of Europe by John Wilkes 1996 pp. 233 236. The Illyrians liked decorated beltbuckles or clasps see figure 29. Some of gold and silver with openwork designs of stylised birds have a similar distribution to the Mramorac bracelets and may also have been produced under Greek influence.  Carte de la Macdoine et du monde gen vers 200 av. J.C.  Webber Christopher Odyrsian arms equipment and tactics.  The Odrysian Kingdom of Thrace Orpheus Unmasked Oxford Monographs on Classical Archaeology by Z. H. Archibald 1998 ISBN 0198150474 p. 3  The Odrysian Kingdom of Thrace Orpheus Unmasked Oxford Monographs on Classical Archaeology by Z. H. Archibald 1998 ISBN 0198150474 p. 5  The Peloponnesian War A Military Study Warfare and History by J. F. Lazenby 2003 p. 224 ... number of strongholds and he made himself useful fighting the Thracians without a king on behalf of the more Hellenized Thracian kings and their Greek neighbours Nepos Alc. ...  Walbank et al. 2008 p. 394.  Boardman John 1993 The Diffusion of Classical Art in Antiquity Princeton University Press p. 308.  Celtic Inscriptions on Gaulish and British Coins by Beale Poste p. 135  Momigliano Arnaldo. Alien Wisdom The Limits of Hellenization pp. 5455.  Tang Birgit 2005 Delos Carthage Ampurias the Housing of Three Mediterranean Trading Centres Rome LErma di Bretschneider Accademia di Danimarca pp. 1516 ISBN 8882653056  Lapunzina Alejandro 2005 Architecture of Spain London Greenwoood Press ISBN 0313319634 pp. 6971.  Tang Birgit 2005 Delos Carthage Ampurias the Housing of Three Mediterranean Trading Centres Rome LErma di Bretschneider Accademia di Danimarca pp. 1718 ISBN 8882653056  Lapunzina Alejandro 2005 Architecture of Spain London Greenwoood Press ISBN 0313319634 p. 70.  Lapunzina Alejandro 2005 Architecture of Spain London Greenwoood Press ISBN 0313319634 pp. 7071.  Tang Birgit 2005 Delos Carthage Ampurias the Housing of Three Mediterranean Trading Centres Rome LErma di Bretschneider Accademia di Danimarca pp. 1617 ISBN 8882653056  Green p. 187  Green p. 190  Price S. R. F. 1984. Rituals and power  the Roman imperial cult in Asia Minor. Cambridge Cambridgeshire Cambridge University Press. ISBN 0521259037. OCLC 10020504.  Green p. 193.  Green p. 291.  Jones Kenneth Raymond 2006. Provincial reactions to Roman imperialism the aftermath of the Jewish revolt A.D. 6670 Parts 6670. University of California Berkeley. p. 174. ISBN 9780542824739. ... and the Greeks or at least the GrecoMacedonian Seleucid Empire replace the Persians as the Easterners.  Society for the Promotion of Hellenic Studies London England 1993. The Journal of Hellenic studies Volumes 113114. Society for the Promotion of Hellenic Studies. p. 211. The Seleucid kingdom has traditionally been regarded as basically a GrecoMacedonian state and its rulers thought of as successors to Alexander.  Baskin Judith R. Seeskin Kenneth 2010. The Cambridge Guide to Jewish History Religion and Culture. Cambridge University Press. p. 37. ISBN 9780521689748. The wars between the two most prominent Greek dynasties the Ptolemies of Egypt and the Seleucids of Syria unalterably change the history of the land of Israel.... As a result the land of Israel became part of the empire of the Syrian Greek Seleucids.  a b c Glubb John Bagot 1967. Syria Lebanon Jordan. Thames  Hudson. p. 34. OCLC 585939. In addition to the court and the army Syrian cities were full of Greek businessmen many of them pure Greeks from Greece. The senior posts in the civil service were also held by Greeks. Although the Ptolemies and the Seleucids were perpetual rivals both dynasties were Greek and ruled by means of Greek officials and Greek soldiers. Both governments made great efforts to attract immigrants from Greece thereby adding yet another racial element to the population.  Bugh Glenn R. editor. The Cambridge Companion to the Hellenistic World 2007. p. 43.  a b Steven C. Hause William S. Maltby 2004. Western civilization a history of European society. Thomson Wadsworth. p. 76. ISBN 9780534621643. The GrecoMacedonian Elite. The Seleucids respected the cultural and religious sensibilities of their subjects but preferred to rely on Greek or Macedonian soldiers and administrators for the daytoday business of governing. The Greek population of the cities reinforced until the second century BC by emigration from Greece formed a dominant although not especially cohesive elite.  Victor Royce M. 2010. Colonial education and class formation in early Judaism a postcolonial reading. Continuum International Publishing Group. p. 55. ISBN 9780567247193. Like other Hellenistic kings the Seleucids ruled with the help of their friends and a GrecoMacedonian elite class separate from the native populations whom they governed.  Britannica Seleucid kingdom 2008 O.Ed.  Bugh Glenn R. editor. The Cambridge Companion to the Hellenistic World 2007 p. 44.  Green pp. 293295.  Green p. 304.  Green p. 421.  The Pergamon Altar. Smarthistory at Khan Academy. Archived from the original on October 10 2014. Retrieved April 5 2013.  Pergamum. cite book website ignored help  Shipley 2000 pp. 318319.  Justin Epitome of Pompeius Trogus 
25.2  and 
26.2  the related subject of copulative compounds where both are of equal weight is exhaustively treated in Anna Granville Hatcher Modern English WordFormation and NeoLatin A Study of the Origins of English Baltimore Johns Hopkins University 1951.  This distinction is remarked upon in William M. Ramsay revised by Mark W. Wilson Historical Commentary on Galatians 1997302 Ramsay notes the 
4 th century AD Paphlagonian Themistius usage   .  Bedal LeighAnn The Petra Poolcomplex A Hellenistic Paradeisos in the Nabataean Capital p. 178.  Gods and Worship. nabataea.net.  Alberge Dalya 21 August 2010. Discovery of ancient cave paintings in Petra stuns art scholars. Theguardian.  Ren Grousset 1946 Histoire de lArmnie in French Paris pp. 90
91 citation CS1 maint location missing publisher link  Bivar A.D.H. 1983 The Political History of Iran under the Arsacids in Yarshater Ehsan Cambridge History of Iran 
3.1  Cambridge UP pp. 2199.  Yarshater Ehsan 1983. The Cambridge History of Iran. Cambridge University Press. p. 
1 xi. ISBN 9780521200929.  Green p. 499.clarification needed  Green p. 501.  Green p. 504.  Ponet James 22 December 2005. The Maccabees and the Hellenists. Faithbased. Slate. Retrieved 4 December 2012.  The Revolt of the Maccabees. Simpletoremember.com. Retrieved 20120813.  McGing B. C. 1986. The Foreign Policy of Mithridates VI Eupator King of Pontus. Leiden The Netherlands E. J. Brill. pp. 9192.  Bopearachchi Osmund 1991. Monnaies GrcoBactriennes et IndoGrecques Catalogue Raisonn in French. Bibliothque Nationale de France. p. 63. ISBN 9782717718256.  The Dynastic Arts of the Kushans John M. Rosenfield University of California Press 1967 p.135 1  R.C. Senior IndoScythian coins and history. Volume IV. The Greek legend clearly implies that the two kings were father and son and Senior dismisses the older reading grandson on the Kharosthi legend.  Ghose Sanujit 2011. Cultural links between India and the GrecoRoman world. Ancient History Encyclopedia.  Chapter XXIX. lakdiva.org.  Mahabharata 
3.1 
88.3 436.  Green P 2008. Alexander The Great and the Hellenistic Age. Phoenix. pp. 102103. ISBN 9780753824139.  a b c Holland T 2004. Rubicon Triumph and Tragedy in the Roman Republic. Abacus. ISBN 9780349115634.  Claessen Henri J. M. Skalnk Peter eds. 1978. The Early State. De Gruyter Mouton. p. 428. doi
10.1 5159783110813326. ISBN 9789027979049.  Gent John. The Scythie nations down to the fall of the Western empire p. 4.  Prag  Quinn editors. The Hellenistic West pp. 229237.  Prvan Vasile. Dacia p. 100.  Green 1990 pp. xx 6869.  Bugh Glenn R. editor. The Cambridge Companion to the Hellenistic World 2007. p. 190.  a b c d e Roy M. MacLeod 2004. The Library Of Alexandria Centre Of Learning In The Ancient World. I.B. Tauris. ISBN 1850435944.  Green p. 23.  Green p. 313.  Green p. 315.  Green p. 22.  von Falkenhausen Lothar 2008. Action and Image in Early Chinese Art. Cahiers dExtrmeAsie. 17 5191. doi
10.3 4
06 asie.20
08.1 272. ISSN 07661177. JSTOR 44171471. Archived from the original on 30 January 2023. Retrieved 30 January 2023.  Chen Yumin 2013. Reflections on Chinas First Collection of Terracotta Acrobats an exhibition review. Visual Communication. 12 4 497502. doi
10.1 1771470357213498175. ISSN 14703572. S
2 CID 147420437. Archived from the original on 30 January 2023. Retrieved 30 January 2023.  a b Qingbo Duan 2022. SinoWestern Cultural Exchange as Seen through the Archaeology of the First Emperors Necropolis. Journal of Chinese History . 7 2172. doi
10.1 0
17 jch.20
22.2 5. ISSN 20591632. S
2 CID 251690411. More than thirtyfive years ago 1986 there was a European scholar German Hafner 19112008 who considered that the art of the terracotta army originated from Western contact originated from knowledge of Alexander the Great and the splendor of Greek art. Lukas Nickel of SOAS has put forward a similar proposition.  Early links with West likely inspiration for Terracotta Warriors argues SOAS scholar. School of Oriental and African Studies SOAS University of London. Archived from the original on 6 October 2017. Retrieved 28 December 2013.  Western contact with China began long before Marco Polo experts say. BBC News. 12 October 2016.  Chinese archaeologist refutes BBC report on Terracotta Warriors. China Daily . Xinhua . www.chinadaily.com. 20161018. Archived from the original on 9 June 2021. Retrieved 9 June 2021.  Hanink Johanna Silva Felipe Rojas 20 November 2016. Why Chinas Terracotta Warriors Are Stirring Controversy. Live Science. Archived from the original on 5 January 2020. Retrieved 5 October 2017. Originally published in Hanink Johanna Silva Felipe Rojas 18 November 2016. Why theres so much backlash to the theory that Greek art inspired Chinas Terracotta Army. The Conversation. Archived from the original on 14 September 2020. Retrieved 22 February 2018.  Bugh pp. 206210.  Bugh p. 209.  Walbank et al. 2008 p. 84.  Walbank et al. 2008 p. 86.  Green p. 402.  Green p. 396.  Green p. 399.  Green pp. 6674.  Green p. 65.  Green p. 179.  Green Peter Alexander to Actium the historical evolution of the Hellenistic age p. 53.  Bill Casselman. One of the Oldest Extant Diagrams from Euclid. University of British Columbia. Retrieved 20080926.  Luce J. V. 1988. Greek Science in its Hellenistic Phase. Hermathena 145 2338. ISSN 00180750. JSTOR 23040930.  Lloyd 1973 p. 177.  Bugh p. 245.  Knorr W. R. 1976. Archimedes and the Measurement of the Circle A New Interpretation. Archive for History of Exact Sciences. 15 2 115140. doi
10.1 0
07 BF00348496. ISSN 00039519. JSTOR 41133444. S
2 CID 120954547.  Swain G. Dence T. 1998. Archimedes Quadrature of the Parabola Revisited. Mathematics Magazine. 71 2 123130. doi
10.2 3072691014. ISSN 00255
70 X. JSTOR 2691014.  Toomer G. J. 1974. The Chord Table of Hipparchus and the Early History of Greek Trigonometry. Centaurus. 18 1 628. Bibcode19
74 Cent...18....
6 T. doi
10.1 1
11 j.160004
98.1 974.tb00205.x. ISSN 00088994.  Russo Lucio 2004. The Forgotten Revolution. Berlin Springer. pp. 273277.  Alfred Randy June 19 2008. June 19 240 B.C.E The Earth Is Round and Its This Big. Wired. Retrieved 20130622.  Otto Neugebauer 1975. A History of Ancient Mathematical Astronomy. New York Springer. pp. 2845. Lloyd 1973 pp. 6971.  Schaefer Bradley E. 2005. The Epoch of the Constellations on the Farnese Atlas and Their Origin in Hipparchuss Lost Catalogue PDF. Journal for the History of Astronomy. 36 2 16796. Bibcode20
05 JHA....36..1
67 S. doi
10.1 177002182860503600202. S
2 CID 15431718. But see also Duke Dennis W. 2006. Analysis of the Farnese Globe. Journal for the History of Astronomy. 37 126 87100. Bibcode20
06 JHA....37...
87 D. doi
10.1 177002182860603700107. S
2 CID 36841784.  Hero 1899. Pneumatika Book  Chapter XI. Herons von Alexandria Druckwerke und Automatentheater in Greek and German. Wilhelm Schmidt translator. Leipzig B.G. Teubner. pp. 228232.  Research Machines plc. 2004. The Hutchinson dictionary of scientific biography. Abingdon Oxon Helicon Publishing. p. 546. Hero of Alexandria lived c. AD 60 Greek mathematician engineer and the greatest experimentalist of antiquity  Green p. 467.  a b Freeth T. et al. 2006. Decoding the ancient Greek astronomical calculator known as the Antikythera Mechanism. Nature. 444 7119 58791. Bibcode20
06 Natur.444..5
87 F. doi
10.1 0
38 nature05357. PMID 17136087. S
2 CID 4424998. Marchant Jo 2006. In Search of Lost Time. Nature. 444 7119 5348. Bibcode20
06 Natur.444..5
34 M. doi
10.1 0384445
34 a. PMID 17136067.  Charette Franois 2006. High tech from Ancient Greece. Nature. 444 7119 5512. Bibcode20
06 Natur.444..5
51 C. doi
10.1 0384445
51 a. PMID 17136077. S
2 CID 33513516. Noble Wilford John 20061130. Early Astronomical Computer Found to Be Technically Complex. The New York Times. Retrieved 20061130.  F. M. Cornford. The Unwritten Philosophy and Other Essays. p. 83. quoted in Lloyd 1973 p. 154.  Russo Lucio 2004. The Forgotten Revolution How Science Was Born in 300 BC and Why It Had To Be Reborn. Berlin Springer. ISBN 3540203966. But see the critical reviews by Mott Greene Nature vol 430 no. 7000 5 Aug 2004614 2 and Michael RowanRobinson Physics World vol. 17 no. 4 April 20043.  Bugh p. 285.  Green Peter Alexander to Actium the historical evolution of the Hellenistic age p. 92.  Green p. 342.  Green Peter Alexander to Actium the historical evolution of the Hellenistic age pp. 117118.  Pliny the Elder Natural History XXXIV 52  a b Kyle Donald G. 2017. Chapter 5 Ancient Greek and Roman Sport. In Edelman Robert Wilson Wayne eds.. The Oxford Handbook of Sports History Robert ed.. Oxford University Press. pp. 8788. ISBN 9780197520956.  Kyle Donald G. 2017. Chapter 5 Ancient Greek and Roman Sport. In Edelman Robert Wilson Wayne eds.. The Oxford Handbook of Sports History. Oxford University Press. ISBN 9780197520956.  Green p. xv.  Herodotus Holland T. Persian Fire p. 193.  Green.full citation needed  The mixture of Roman Greek and Jewish elements admirably adapted Antioch for the great part it played in the early history of Christianity. The city was the cradle of the church.  Antioch Encyclopaedia Biblica Vol. I p. 186 p. 125 of 612 in online .pdf file. Warning Takes several minutes to download. Works citededit Lloyd G. E. R. Greek Science after Aristotle. New York W.W. Norton  Co 1973. ISBN 0393007804. Further readingedit Austin M. M. The Hellenistic World From Alexander to the Roman Conquest A Selection of Ancient Sources In Translation. Cambridge Cambridge University Press 1981. Bugh Glenn Richard ed.. The Cambridge Companion to the Hellenistic World. Cambridge Cambridge University Press 2006. Brm Henning and Nino Luraghi eds.. The Polis in the Hellenistic World. Stuttgart Franz Steiner Verlag 2018. Cary M. A History of the Greek World From 323 to 146 B.C. London Methuen 1963. Cerqueiro Daniel. La Hlade Umbral de la civilizacin occidental. Ed. Pequea Venecia. Buenos Aires 2013 ISBN 9789879239
23.0  Chamoux Franois. Hellenistic Civilization. Malden MA Blackwell Pub. 2003. Champion Michael and Lara OSullivan. Cultural Perceptions of Violence In the Hellenistic World. New York Routledge 2017. Erskine Andrew ed.. A Companion to the Hellenistic World. Hoboken Wiley 2008. Goodman Martin. Under the influence Hellenism in ancient Jewish life. Biblical Archaeology Review 36 no. 1 2010 60. Grainger John D. Great Power Diplomacy In the Hellenistic World. New York Routledge 2017. Green Peter. Alexander to Actium The Historical Evolution of the Hellenistic Age. Berkeley University of California Press 1990. Green Peter 2008. The Hellenistic Age. Random House Publishing Group. ISBN 9781588367068. Kralli Ioanna. The Hellenistic Peloponnese Interstate Relations a Narrative and Analytic History From the Fourth Century to 146 BC. Swansea The Classical Press of Wales 2017. Lewis D. M. John Boardman and Simon Hornblower. Cambridge Ancient History Vol. 6 The Fourth Century BC. 
2 nd ed. Cambridge Cambridge University Press 1994. Rimell Victoria and Markus Asper. Imagining Empire Political Space In Hellenistic and Roman Literature. Heidelberg Universittsverlag Winter GmbH 2017. Thonemann Peter. The Hellenistic Age. First edition. Oxford Oxford University Press 2016. Walbank F. W. The Hellenistic World. Cambridge Harvard University Press 1982. External linksedit Library resources about Hellenistic period Online books Resources in your library Resources in other libraries Media related to Hellenistic age at Wikimedia Commons Waterloo Institute for Hellenistic Studies Art of the Hellenistic Age and the Hellenistic Tradition at the MET Alexandria Center for Hellenistic Studies Links to related articles v t e The division of Alexanders empire v t e Hellenistic rulers Argeads Philip II Alexander III the Great Philip III Arrhidaeus Alexander IV Antipatrids Cassander Philip IV Alexander V Antipater II Antipater Etesias Sosthenes Antigonids Antigonus I Monophthalmus Demetrius I Poliorcetes Antigonus II Gonatas Demetrius II Aetolicus Antigonus III Doson Philip V Perseus Philip VI pretender Ptolemies Ptolemy I Soter Ptolemy Keraunos Ptolemy II Philadelphus Ptolemy III Euergetes Ptolemy IV Philopator Ptolemy V Epiphanes Cleopatra I Syra regent Ptolemy VI Philometor Ptolemy VII Neos Philopator Cleopatra II Philometor Soter Ptolemy VIII Physcon Cleopatra III Ptolemy IX Lathyros Ptolemy X Alexander Berenice III Ptolemy XI Alexander Ptolemy XII Auletes Cleopatra VI Tryphaena Berenice IV Epiphanea Ptolemy XIII Ptolemy XIV Cleopatra VII Philopator Ptolemy XV Caesarion Monarchs of Cyrene Magas Berenice II Demetrius the Fair Ptolemy VIII Physcon Ptolemy Apion Cleopatra Selene II Seleucids Seleucus I Nicator Antiochus I Soter Antiochus II Theos Seleucus II Callinicus Seleucus III Ceraunus Antiochus III the Great Seleucus IV Philopator Antiochus IV Epiphanes Antiochus V Eupator Demetrius I Soter Alexander I Balas Demetrius II Nicator Antiochus VI Dionysus Diodotus Tryphon Antiochus VII Sidetes Alexander II Zabinas Cleopatra Thea Seleucus V Philometor Antiochus VIII Grypus Antiochus IX Cyzicenus Seleucus VI Epiphanes Antiochus X Eusebes Antiochus XI Epiphanes Demetrius III Eucaerus Philip I Philadelphus Antiochus XII Dionysus Cleopatra Selene I Antiochus XIII Asiaticus Philip II Philoromaeus Lysimachids Lysimachus Ptolemy Epigonos Attalids Philetaerus Eumenes I Attalus I Eumenes II Attalus II Attalus III Eumenes III GrecoBactrians Diodotus I Diodotus II Euthydemus I Demetrius I Euthydemus II Antimachus I Pantaleon Agathocles Demetrius II Eucratides I Plato Eucratides II Heliocles I IndoGreeks Demetrius I Antimachus I Pantaleon Agathocles Apollodotus I Demetrius II Antimachus II Menander I Zoilos I Agathokleia Lysias Strato I Antialcidas Heliokles II Polyxenos Demetrius III Philoxenus Diomedes Amyntas Epander Theophilos Peukolaos Thraso Nicias Menander II Artemidoros Hermaeus Archebius Telephos Apollodotus II Hippostratos Dionysios Zoilos II Apollophanes Strato II Strato III Monarchs of Bithynia Boteiras Bas Zipoetes I Nicomedes I Zipoetes II Etazeta regent Ziaelas Prusias I Prusias II Nicomedes II Nicomedes III Nicomedes IV Socrates Chrestus Monarchs of Pontus Mithridates I Ctistes Ariobarzanes Mithridates II Mithridates III Pharnaces I Mithridates IV Philopator Philadephos with Laodice Mithridates V Euergetes Mithridates VI Eupator Pharnaces II Darius Arsaces Polemon I Pythodorida Polemon II Monarchs of Commagene Ptolemaeus Sames II Mithridates I Antiochus I Mithridates II Antiochus II Mithridates III Antiochus III Antiochus IV Monarchs of Cappadocia Ariarathes I Ariarathes II Ariamnes II Ariarathes III Ariarathes IV Ariarathes V Orophernes Ariarathes VI Ariarathes VII Ariarathes VIII Ariarathes IX Ariobarzanes I Ariobarzanes II Ariobarzanes III Ariarathes X Archelaus Monarchs of the Cimmerian Bosporus Paerisades I Satyros II Prytanis Eumelos Spartokos III Hygiainon regent Paerisades II Spartokos IV Leukon II Spartokos V ru Kamasarye Paerisades III Paerisades IV Paerisades V Mithridates I Pharnaces Asander with Dynamis Mithridates II Asander with Dynamis Scriboniuss attempted rule with Dynamis Dynamis with Polemon Polemon Aspurgus Gepaepyris Mithridates III Cotys I Monarchs of Epirus Admetus Tharrhypas Alcetas I Neoptolemus I Arybbas Alexander I Aeacides Neoptolemus II Alcetas II Pyrrhus I Alexander II Olympias II regent Pyrrhus II Ptolemy Pyrrhus III Deidamia Hellenistic rulers were preceded by Hellenistic satraps in most of their territories. v t e History of Europe Prehistory Paleolithic Europe Neolithic Europe Bronze Age Europe Iron Age Europe Classical antiquity Classical Greece Roman Republic Hellenistic period Roman Empire Early Christianity Christianity in late antiquity Crisis of the Third Century Fall of the Western Roman Empire Late antiquity Middle Ages Early Middle Ages Migration Period Christianity in the Middle Ages Christianization Francia AngloSaxon England Byzantine Empire Papal States Bulgarian Empire First Second Maritime republics Venice Genoa Pisa Amalfi Viking Age Kievan Rus Crown of Aragon Aragon Catalonia Valencia Majorca Holy Roman Empire High Middle Ages Republic of Florence Feudalism Crusades Mongol invasion Serbian Empire Late Middle Ages Black Death Hundred Years War Kalmar Union Early modern Renaissance Christianity in the modern era Reformation Age of Discovery Baroque Grand Duchy of Tuscany Thirty Years War Absolute monarchy Ottoman Empire Portuguese Empire Spanish Empire Early modern France PolishLithuanian Commonwealth Cossack Hetmanate Swedish Empire Dutch Republic British Empire Habsburg monarchy Russian Empire Age of Enlightenment Late modern Great Divergence Industrial Revolution French Revolution Napoleonic Wars Nationalism Revolutions of 1848 World War I Russian Revolution Interwar period World War II Cold War European integration European debt crisis COVID19 pandemic Russian invasion of Ukraine See also Art of Europe Bibliography of European history Genetic history of Europe History of Christianity History of the Mediterranean region History of the European Union History of Western civilization Maritime history of Europe Military history of Europe Crusading movement v t e Ancient Greece Timeline History Geography Periods Cycladic civilization Minoan civilization Mycenaean Greece Greek Dark Ages Archaic Greece Classical Greece Hellenistic Greece Roman Greece Geography Aegean Sea Aeolis Crete Cyrenaica Cyprus Doris Epirus Hellespont Ionia Ionian Sea Macedonia Magna Graecia Peloponnesus Pontus Taurica Ancient Greek colonies City states Politics Military City states Argos Athens Byzantion Chalcis Corinth Ephesus Miletus Pergamon Eretria Kerkyra Larissa Megalopolis Thebes Megara Rhodes Samos Sparta Lissus Crete Kingdoms Bithynia Cappadocia Epirus GrecoBactrian Kingdom IndoGreek Kingdom Macedonia Pergamon Pontus Ptolemaic Kingdom Seleucid Empire Federations Confederations Doric Hexapolis c.1100  c.560 BC Italiote League c.800389 BC Ionian League c. 650404 BC Peloponnesian League c.550366 BC Amphictyonic League c.595279 BC Acarnanian League c. 50031 BC Hellenic League 499449 BC Delian League 478404 BC Chalcidian League 430348 BC Boeotian League c. 4
24 c. 395 BC Aetolian League c. 400188 BC Second Athenian League 378355 BC Thessalian League 374196 BC Arcadian League 3
70 c. 230 BC Epirote League 370168 BC League of Corinth 338322 BC Euboean League c. 300 BCc. 300 AD Achaean League 280146 BC Politics Boule Free city Koinon Proxeny Stasis Tagus Tyrant Athenian Agora Areopagus Ecclesia Graphe paranomon Heliaia Ostracism Spartan Ekklesia Ephor Gerousia Macedon Synedrion Koinon Military Wars Athenian military Scythian archers Antigonid Macedonian army Army of Macedon Ballista Cretan archers Hellenistic armies Hippeis Hoplite Hetairoi Macedonian phalanx Military of Mycenaean Greece Phalanx Peltast Pezhetairos Sarissa Sacred Band of Thebes Sciritae Seleucid army Spartan army Strategos Toxotai Xiphos Xyston People List of ancient Greeks Rulers Kings of Argos Archons of Athens Kings of Athens Kings of Commagene Diadochi Kings of Macedonia Kings of Paionia Attalid kings of Pergamon Kings of Pontus Ptolemaic dynasty Seleucid dynasty Kings of Sparta Tyrants of Syracuse Artists  scholars Astronomers Geographers Historians Mathematicians Philosophers Playwrights Poets Seven Sages Writers Philosophers Anaxagoras Anaximander Anaximenes Antisthenes Aristotle Democritus Diogenes of Sinope Empedocles Epicurus Gorgias Heraclitus Hypatia Leucippus Parmenides Plato Protagoras Pythagoras Socrates Thales Zeno Authors Aeschylus Aesop Alcaeus Archilochus Aristophanes Bacchylides Euripides Herodotus Hesiod Hipponax Homer Ibycus Lucian Menander Mimnermus Panyassis Philocles Pindar Plutarch Polybius Sappho Simonides Sophocles Stesichorus Theognis Thucydides Timocreon Tyrtaeus Xenophon Others Athenian statesmen Lawgivers Olympic victors Tyrants By culture Ancient Greek tribes Thracian Greeks Ancient Macedonians Society Culture Society Agriculture Calendar Clothing Coinage Cuisine Economy Education Euergetism Festivals Folklore Homosexuality Law Olympic Games Pederasty Philosophy Prostitution Religion Slavery Warfare Wedding customs Wine Arts and science Architecture Greek Revival architecture Astronomy Literature Mathematics Medicine Music Musical system Pottery Sculpture Technology Theatre GrecoBuddhist art Religion Funeral and burial practices Mythology mythological figures Temple Twelve Olympians Underworld GrecoBuddhism GrecoBuddhist monasticism Sacred places Eleusis Delphi Delos Dion Dodona Mount Olympus Olympia Structures Athenian Treasury Lion Gate Long Walls Philippeion Theatre of Dionysus Tunnel of Eupalinos Temples Aphaea Artemis Athena Nike Erechtheion Hephaestus Hera Olympia Parthenon Samothrace Zeus Olympia Language ProtoGreek Mycenaean Homeric Dialects Aeolic Arcadocypriot Attic Doric Epirote Ionic Locrian Macedonian Pamphylian Koine Writing Linear A Linear B Cypriot syllabary Greek alphabet Greek numerals Attic numerals Greek colonisation Magna Graecia Mainland Italy Alision Brentesion Caulonia Chone Croton Cumae Elea Heraclea Lucania Hipponion Hydrus Krimisa Las Locri Medma Metapontion Nepolis Pandosia Lucania Poseidonia Pixous Rhegion Scylletium Siris Sybaris Sybaris on the Traeis Taras Terina Thurii Sicily Akragas Akrai Akrillai Apollonia Calacte Casmenae Catana Gela Helorus Henna Heraclea Minoa Himera Hybla Gereatis Hybla Heraea Kamarina Leontinoi Megara Hyblaea Messana Naxos Segesta Selinous Syracuse Tauromenion Thermae Tyndaris Aeolian Islands Didyme Euonymos Ereikousa Hycesia LiparaMeligounis Phoenicusa Strongyle Therassa Cyrenaica Balagrae Barca Berenice Cyrene Apollonia Ptolemais Iberian Peninsula Akra Leuke Alonis Emporion Helike Hemeroscopion Kalathousa Kypsela Mainake Menestheuss Limin Illicitanus LiminPortus Illicitanus Rhode Salauris Zacynthos Illyria Aspalathos Apollonia Aulon Epidamnos Epidauros Issa Melaina Korkyra Nymphaion Orikon Pharos Tragurion Thronion Black Sea basin North coast Akra Borysthenes Charax Chersonesus Dioscurias Gorgippia Hermonassa Kalos Limen Kepoi Kerkinitis Kimmerikon Myrmekion Nikonion Nymphaion Olbia Pantikapaion Phanagoria Pityus Tanais Theodosia Tyras Tyritake South coast Abonoteichos Amisos Anchialos Apollonia Athina Bathus Dionysopolis Cotyora Cytorus Eupatoria Heraclea Kerasous Mesambria Odessos Oine Phasis Polemonion Rhizos Salmydessus Sesamus Sinope Thrmae Tium Trapezous Tripolis Zaliche Lists Cities in Epirus People Place names Stoae Temples Theatres Category Portal Outline v t e Greece topics Basic topics Alphabetical index of topics History Prehistory pre1100 BC Neolithic Age Bronze Age Pelasgians Cycladic civilization Minoan civilization Helladic period Mycenaean period Bronze Age collapse Antiquity 1100 BC330 AD Greek Dark Ages Iron Age migrations Archaic period GrecoPersian Wars Classical period Delian and Peloponnesian League Peloponnesian War League of Corinth Wars of Alexander the Great Hellenistic period Wars of the Diadochi RomanGreek wars Roman era Foundation of Constantinople Middle Ages 3301453 Byzantine period Persecution of paganism Migration period Plague of Justinian ArabByzantine wars Iconoclasm Macedonian Renaissance EastWest Schism Fourth Crusade Frankokratia Empire of Nicaea Despotate of Epirus and Despotate of the Morea Fall of Constantinople Early modern and Modern era post1453 Stato da Mr Venetian Ionian islands Kingdom of Candia Ottoman Greece Modern Greek Enlightenment Septinsular Republic War of Independence First Republic Kingdom Balkan Wars World War I National Schism GrecoTurkish War Second Republic 
4 th of August Regime World War II Civil war Military junta Democratization Third Republic By topic Ancient regions and tribes Byzantine and Ottoman Greeks Christianization Colonization Coups dtat Demographic Modern Economic Geographical name changes Greek countries and regions Greek Muslims Renaissance scholars Hellenic languages and ProtoGreek Inventions and discoveries Language question Military Monarchy Kings and royal family Phanariotes Polis Population exchange of 1923 Geography Overview Borders Cities capital and cocapital Extreme points Place names Regions Central Greece AetoliaAcarnania Aetolia Acarnania Attica Boeotia Euboea Evrytania Phocis Phthiotis Saronic Islands Crete Chania Heraklion Rethymno Lasithi Cyclades Andros Delos Kea Kythnos Milos Mykonos Naxos Paros Santorini Syros Tinos Dodecanese Agathonisi Astypalaia Chalki Kalymnos Karpathos Kasos Kos Leipsoi Leros Nisyros Patmos Rhodes Symi Tilos Kastellorizo Epirus Arta Ioannina Preveza Thesprotia Ionian Islands Corfu Ithaca Kefalonia Kythira Lefkada Paxi Zakynthos Macedonia Chalkidiki Drama Florina Grevena Imathia Kastoria Kavala Kilkis Kozani Pella Pieria Serres Thasos Thessaloniki North Aegean islands Chios Ikaria Lemnos Lesbos Samos Peloponnese Arcadia Argolis Corinthia Laconia Messenia Achaea Elis Thessaly Karditsa Larissa Magnesia Trikala Sporades Thrace Evros Rhodope Xanthi Terrain Canyons and gorges Caves Geology Islands Aegean Ionian Crete Mountains Olympus Pindus Rhodopes Peninsulas Plains Volcanoes Water Coasts Lakes Rivers Mediterranean Sea Aegean Sea Sea of Crete Icarian Sea Myrtoan Sea Thracian Sea Ionian Sea Libyan Sea Environment Climate Natural disasters earthquakes Ecoregions Environmental issues Forests Mammals and birds National Parks Protected areas Politics Constitution Constitutional amendments 1986 2001 2008 2019 Constitutions 1822 1827 1844 1864 1911 Supreme Special Court Executive Cabinet Government Government Gazette President Presidential Mansion Prime Minister Maximos Mansion Legislature Conference of Presidents Hellenic Parliament Speaker Parliamentary Committees Presidium Elections Nationality law Parataxis Parliamentary constituencies Pasokification Political parties Judicial system Council of State Court of Audit Supreme Court Security Police Capital punishment Corruption Crime Greek mafia Life imprisonment Terrorism Coast Guard Foreign relations Aegean dispute Cyprus dispute Council of Europe European Union Macedonia naming dispute Language naming dispute NATO Passport Treaties United Nations Military Air Force Alliances Army Conscription Military ranks Navy Evzones Presidential Guard National Guard Tomb of the Unknown Soldier Social issues Abortion Cannabis Education universities Healthcare hospitals obesity smoking Human rights Human rights abuses LGBT rights Prostitution Political scandals Racism Ideologies Conservatism Monarchism Fascism Metaxism Liberalism Republicanism Venizelism Nationalism Hellenocentrism Megali Idea Enosis New Social Movements Environmentalism Feminism Pacifism Socialism Laocracy Trotskyism Anarchism Administrative divisions Municipalities and communities Administrative regions Regional units Decentralized administrations Economy Agriculture Airports Athens Stock Exchange companies Banking Central bank Central bank Brands Companies electric power Debt crisis Grexit Drachma Energy renewable nuclear Euro coins Greece and the International Monetary Fund Greek economic miracle Highways Laiki agora Ports Public pensions Railways history Rankings Science and technology Shipping Merchant Marine Space Agency Subdivisions by GDP Taxation Telecommunications Thessaloniki International Fair Tourism Trade unions Transportation RioAntirrio bridge Athens Metro Thessaloniki Metro Water supply and sanitation Society Demographics Diaspora Greeks names of Greece and the Greeks Immigration Minorities Muslim minority Jews Arvanites Aromanians Aromanian question MeglenoRomanians Slavophones Roma Women Life expectancy Culture Anastenaria Caryatid Clean Monday Concept of kingship Dress Chiton Chlamys Exomis Fustanella Himation Mariners cap Peplos Perizoma Tsarouchi Vraka Eastern Party Festivals Folklore Greek East and Latin West Greektown Hellenization Hospitality Carols Christmas New Years Theophanys Mangas Mountza Naming customs Paideia Philhellenism and Hellenophobia Plate smashing Philosophy Public holidays Independence Day Ohi Day Rouketopolemos Souliotic songs Theophany Tsiknopempti Units of measurement Worry beads Art Architecture Castles Cretan and Heptanese School Modern art 
19 th century Theatre Ancient Religious art Cuisine Breads Daktyla Kritsini Lagana Paximadi Tsoureki Desserts Diples Halva Koulourakia Kourabiedes Loukoumades Melomakarona Pasteli Spoon sweets Vasilopita List of dishes Drinks Mastika Metaxa Ouzo Rakomelo Sideritis Tentura Tsipouro Tsikoudia Frapp coffee Cheeses Anthotyros Feta Graviera Kasseri Kefalotyri Ladotyri Manouri Metsovone Mizithra Filo Amygdalopita Bougatsa Galaktoboureko Karydopita Spanakopita Tiropita Greek salad Dakos Meze Pasta Gogges Flomaria Hilopites Restaurants Kafenio Ouzeri Taverna Sauces Skordalia Taramosalata Tirokafteri Tzatziki Souvlaki Varieties Heptanesean Cretan Epirote Macedonian Wine Agiorgitiko Aidini Assyrtiko Athiri Kotsifali Lesbian Limnio Mavrodafni Mandilaria Malagousia Malvasia Moschofilero Retsina Robola Savatiano Vilana Xinomavro Languages Greek alphabet History Orthography Diacritics Braille Cyrillization Romanization Greeklish and numerals Greek language Demotic Katharevousa and dialects Cappadocian Cretan Cypriot GrecoAustralian Maniot Pontic Tsakonian Yevanic Greek Sign Language History Mycenaean Greek Ancient Greek Koine Greek Medieval Greek Modern Greek Literature Ancient Medieval Modern Minority Languages Albanian language Arvanitika Aromanian Balkan Romani Bulgarian Ladino Macedonian Turkish Place names and exonyms Proverbs Words for love Media Cinema Internet Newspapers Television Media freedom Corruption Music Church music Dances Ai Georgis Angaliastos Antikristos Ballos Dionysiakos Fisounis Gaitanaki Geranos Hasapiko Ikariotikos Kalamatianos Kangeli Kastorianos Kerkiraikos Kleistos Koftos Pidikhtos Leventikos Maniatikos Metsovitikos Ntames Palamakia Partalos Pentozali Proskinitos Pyrrhichios Rougatsiarikos Sirtaki Sousta Syrtos Trata Tsakonikos Tsamikos Zeibekiko Zervos ntekhno Folk music Cretan Epirote Heptanesian Macedonian Nisiotika Peloponnesian Pontic Thessalian Thracian Hip Hop Ionian School Lako Skyladiko Musical instruments Askomandoura Aulos Bouzouki Byzantine lyra Cretan Macedonian Politiki Pontic Crotala Floghera Gaida Harp Laouto Lyre Organo Pan flute Phorminx Psaltery Salpinx Santouri Souravli Tambouras Tambourine Trigono Tsampouna Tympano Zilia Rebetiko Rock Punk Religion and lore Ancient religion Origins Modern Revival Aerico Buddhism Catholicism Drosoulites Eastern Orthodox Church Timeline Antiquity Early Middle Ages Late Middle Ages Early Modern Era 
19 th century Early 
20 th century Late 
20 th century Contemporary Fairy tales Gello Greek Orthodox Church Ecumenical Patriarchate of Constantinople Church of Greece Flag Greek Old Calendarists Hinduism Hypertimos Islam Judaism History Kallikantzaros Lamia Mormo Mount Athos Mythology Primordial deities Titans Twelve Olympians Heracles Odysseus Jason Oedipus Perseus Daedalus Orpheus Theseus Bellerephon Satyr Centaur Nymph Protestantism Psychai Sikhism Thymiaterion Name days Vrykolakas Wayside shrine Sport Ancient Olympics Baseball Basketball Cricket Football Hockey Ice hockey Modern Olympics 1896 1906 2004 Rugby league Symbols Anthem Coat of arms Flag and national colours Flags Motto Orders and decorations World Heritage Sites Category Portal Authority control databases National France BnF data Germany Israel United States Japan Czech Republic Retrieved from httpsen.wikipedia.orgwindex.phptitleHellenisticperiodoldid1220623774 Category Hellenistic period Hidden categories Webarchive template wayback links Articles containing Ancient Greek to 14
53 language text All articles with incomplete citations Articles with incomplete citations from December 2023 CS1 errors periodical ignored CS1 maint location missing publisher CS1 Frenchlanguage sources fr Wikipedia articles needing clarification from December 2023 CS1 Greeklanguage sources el CS1 Germanlanguage sources de Pages using the EasyTimeline extension Articles with short description Short description is different from Wikidata Articles to be merged from January 2024 All articles to be merged All articles with unsourced statements Articles with unsourced statements from March 2021 Pages using multiple image with auto scaled images Articles needing additional references from February 2021 All articles needing additional references Articles with unsourced statements from August 2022 Articles containing Latinlanguage text Commons category link is on Wikidata Articles with BNF identifiers Articles with BNFdata identifiers Articles with GND identifiers Articles with J
9 U identifiers Articles with LCCN identifiers Articles with NDL identifiers Articles with NKC identifiers This page was last edited on 24 April 2024 at 2242 UTC. Text is available under the Creative Commons AttributionShareAlike License 
4.0  additional terms may apply. By using this site you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation Inc. a nonprofit organization. Privacy policy About Wikipedia Disclaimers Contact Wikipedia Code of Conduct Developers Statistics Cookie statement Mobile view Toggle limited content width